Detecting drug-resistant tuberculosis: the importance of rapid testing.Despite numerous intervention strategies, including the direct observed short-course treatment strategy and improved diagnostic methods, the incidence of multidrug-resistant and extensively drug-resistant tuberculosis (TB) continues to rise globally. Many treatment policies are based on the model that acquisition of drug resistance in already infected individuals drives the drug-resistant TB epidemic, hence the focus on drug-resistance testing of retreatment cases. However, molecular epidemiology and mathematical modeling suggest that the majority of multidrug-resistant TB cases are due to ongoing transmission of multidrug-resistant strains. This is most likely the result of diagnostic delay, thereby emphasizing the need for rapid diagnostics and comprehensive contact tracing, as well as active case finding. Current diagnosis of TB in low-income, high-burden regions relies on smear microscopy and clinical signs and symptoms. However, this smear-centered approach has many pitfalls, including low sensitivity in HIV patients and children, the inability of smear to reveal drug-resistance patterns, and the need for sampling on consecutive days. In order to address these limitations, efforts have been made to expand access to Mycobacterium tuberculosis culture and drug susceptibility testing. However, the slow growth rate of the causative agent, M. tuberculosis, contributes to significant diagnostic delay. Molecular-based diagnostic methods, targeting mutations that are known to confirm drug resistance, are capable of significantly reducing diagnostic delay. Two such methods, the line-probe assay and the real-time PCR-based Xpert® MTB/RIF assay, have been described. The latter test shows particular promise for smear-negative and extrapulmonary specimens. This may prove especially useful in settings where co-infection rates with HIV are high. However, since most research focuses on the performance of both of these assays, further investigations need to be done regarding the impact of the routine implementation of these assays on TB control programs and the cost effectiveness thereof.Implementation of Xpert MTB/RIF for routine point-of-care diagnosis of tuberculosis at the primary care level.Xpert MTB/RIF (Xpert) offers rapid detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis and rifampicin resistance. However, little is known about routine point-of-care (POC) use in high TB/HIV burden settings. We describe our experiences of launching Xpert as the POC, initial diagnostic for all TB suspects at a primary healthcare clinic in Johannesburg, South Africa. Noted important benefits of POC Xpert were fewer clinic visits, rapid detection of TB and rifampicin resistance, real-time assessment of accompanying household members of new TB cases, and increased staff motivation for TB screening. While Xpert results are available within 2 hours, actual turn-around time was longer for most patients because of sample preparation time and clinic congestion. Consequently, a GX4 instrument did not result in a 16-test capacity during an 8-hour working day, and some patients did not receive same-day results. Loss to follow-up was an unforeseen challenge, overcome by clinic flow changes, marking of clinic files, documenting patients' physical description and locating patients in the clinic by cell phone. Staff with high school education successfully performed the assay after minimal training. Human resource requirements were considerable, with a minimum of 2 staff needed to supervise sputum collection, process sputum, perform assays, and document results for an average of 15 TB suspects daily. POC placement of the instrument transferred logistical responsibilities to the clinic, including quality assurance, maintenance, stock control and cartridge disposal. POC use of Xpert is feasible at the primary healthcare level but must be accompanied by financial, operational and logistical support.Xpert® MTB/RIF assay: development, evaluation and implementation of a new rapid molecular diagnostic for tuberculosis and rifampicin resistance.Global TB control efforts have been severely hampered by the lack of diagnostic tests that are accurate, simple to use and can be applied at the point of clinical care. This has been further compounded by the widespread inability to test for drug resistance. The Xpert(®) MTB/RIF assay is a rapid molecular assay that can be used close to the point of care by operators with minimal technical expertise, enabling diagnosis of TB and simultaneous assessment of rifampicin resistance to be completed within 2 h. Moreover, this can be accomplished using unprocessed sputum samples as well as clinical specimens from extrapulmonary sites. We review in detail the development of this assay, its evaluation within the laboratory, its utility among adult and pediatric TB suspects, its use as a screening tool for HIV-associated TB and studies of its implementation at the district and sub-district levels in resource-limited settings. Following endorsement by the WHO in 2010, we consider the next steps in the implementation of the assay and its potential impact in high burden settings.Clinical significance of lipoarabinomannan detection in urine using a low-cost point-of-care diagnostic assay for HIV-associated tuberculosis.A low-cost point-of-care urine assay for lipoarabinomannan (LAM) used for screening patients prior to antiretroviral therapy (ART) rapidly diagnoses a proportion of tuberculosis (TB) cases. We determined the characteristics and outcomes of such patients.Adults enrolling in a South African township ART clinic were systematically screened for pulmonary TB by testing paired sputum samples using microscopy, liquid culture and Xpert MTB/RIF in a centralized laboratory. Stored urine samples were retrospectively tested for LAM using the Determine TB-LAM assay, but results did not inform treatment. Patients were followed up in the routine ART service and early (90-day) programmatic outcomes were determined. Analysis was restricted to those with CD4 cell counts below 200 cells/μl.Of patients with CD4 cell counts below 200 cells/μl and complete results (n=325), 59 (18.2%) had culture-positive TB. Of these, 23 (39%) patients tested urine LAM-positive and 36 (61%) urine LAM-negative. Patients with LAM-positive TB had much lower CD4 cell counts, higher plasma viral loads, lower haemoglobin concentrations and lower BMIs compared to those with LAM-negative TB. They also had evidence of higher mycobacterial load, more frequently testing sputum smear-positive, Xpert-positive (sputum and urine) and having a shorter time to sputum culture positivity. Of five (8.5%) patients who died, four did so before TB treatment was started. All five retrospectively tested LAM-positive.A low-cost point-of-care urine test for LAM rapidly diagnoses a sub-group of cases with advanced HIV-associated TB and poor prognosis. If used in combination with laboratory-based diagnostics, treatment delays would decrease and survival might be improved.Containment of bioaerosol infection risk by the Xpert MTB/RIF assay and its applicability to point-of-care settings.The recently introduced Xpert MTB/RIF assay (Xpert) has point-of-care potential, but its capacity for biohazard containment remained to be studied. We compared the bioaerosols generated by the Xpert assay to acid-fast bacillus (AFB) microscope slide smear preparation. The Xpert assay sample treatment reagent (SR) was also studied for its sterilizing capacity, stability, and effect on assay sensitivity after prolonged treatment. During the preparation of AFB smears, sputum samples spiked with Mycobacterium bovis BCG at 5 × 10(8) CFU/ml produced 16 and 325 CFU/m(3) air measured with an Andersen impactor or BioSampler, respectively. In contrast, neither the sample preparation steps for the Xpert assay nor its automated processing produced any culturable bioaerosols. In testing of SR sterilizing capacity, clinical sputum samples from strongly smear-positive tuberculosis patients treated with SR at a 2:1 ratio eliminated Mycobacterium tuberculosis growth in all but 1/39 or 3/45 samples cultured on solid or liquid medium, respectively. These few unsterilized samples had a mean 13.1-day delay in the time to positive culture. SR treatment at a 3:1 ratio eliminated growth in all samples. SR retained a greater than 6-log-unit killing capacity despite storage at temperatures spanning 4 to 45°C for at least 3 months. The effect of prolonged SR sample treatment was also studied. Spiked sputum samples could be incubated in SR for up to 3 days without affecting Xpert sensitivity for M. tuberculosis detection and up to 8 h without affecting specificity for rifampin resistance detection. These results suggest that benchtop use of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay limits infection risk to the user.Clinical validation of Xpert MTB/RIF for the diagnosis of extrapulmonary tuberculosis.Extrapulmonary tuberculosis (EPTB) accounts for more than 20% of tuberculosis (TB) cases. Xpert MTB/RIF (Xpert) (Cepheid, Sunnyvale, CA, USA) is a fully automated amplification system, for which excellent results in the diagnosis of pulmonary TB in highly endemic countries have been recently reported. We aimed to assess the performance of the Xpert system in diagnosing EPTB in a low incidence setting. We investigated with Xpert a large number of consecutive extrapulmonary clinical specimens (1,476, corresponding to 1,068 patients) including both paediatric (494) and adult samples. We found, in comparison with a reference standard consisting of combination of culture and clinical diagnosis of TB, an overall sensitivity and specificity of 81.3% and 99.8% for Xpert, while the sensitivity of microscopy was 48%. For biopsies, urines, pus and cerebrospinal fluids the sensitivity exceeded 85%, while it was slightly under 80% for gastric aspirates. It was, in contrast, lower than 50% for cavitary fluids. High sensitivity and specificity (86.9% and 99.7%, respectively) were also obtained for paediatric specimens. Although the role of culture remains central in the microbiological diagnosis of EPTB, the sensitivity of Xpert in rapidly diagnosing the disease makes it a much better choice compared to smear microscopy. The ability to rule out the disease still remains suboptimal.Tuberculosis assays: past, present and future.Recent developments in the field of TB diagnostics, including the introduction of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay in field testing, raise the hope for faster and more accurate identification of active TB patients. However, there are still many issues that need to be addressed as no point-of-care tests are yet available. Furthermore, no tests are available which are universally applicable to all patients. Improvements in the microbiological and molecular-based approaches are promising and the diagnostic pipeline is encouraging. Host markers associated with active disease may hold promise, especially in situations where sputum diagnostics are problematic, including in children, HIV-infected individuals and in the case of extrapulmonary TB.The Xpert® MTB/RIF assay evaluation in South Korea, a country with an intermediate tuberculosis burden.A central hospital laboratory in South Korea.To evaluate the usefulness of the Xpert® MTB/RIF assay in a country with an intermediate tuberculosis burden.A total of 71 real-time polymerase chain reaction-positive sputum sediments were tested within 24 h by the Xpert MTB/RIF assay. Mycobacterium tuberculosis detection was compared with smear microscopy and culture. Rifampicin (RMP) resistance was compared with a culture-based method and rpoB gene sequencing. We also assessed the limit of detection for mutant proportions and time savings in diagnosis.The Xpert MTB/RIF assay detected M. tuberculosis in 71 (100%) specimens (32 smear-positive, 39 smear-negative). This assay showed 100% (62/62) concordance with drug resistance confirmed by culture and 98.4% (61/62) concordance with sequencing. A specimen containing approximately 50% of mutant p.His526Tyr was falsely interpreted as wild-type bacilli by this assay. The minimal detection ratio was 5:1 of mutant vs. wild-type cells. The median time saved was 18.5 days (range 9-30) for the diagnosis of M. tuberculosis and 81.5 days (65-136) for RMP susceptibility in smear-negative, culture-positive patients.The Xpert MTB/RIF assay showed high sensitivity in detecting M. tuberculosis with information on RMP resistance, and had a more rapid time to diagnosis compared to conventional tests; however, the location and amount of mutation may affect test sensitivity.Correlation of mycobacterium tuberculosis specific and non-specific quantitative Th1 T-cell responses with bacillary load in a high burden setting.Measures of bacillary load in patients with tuberculosis (TB) may be useful for predicting and monitoring response to treatment. The relationship between quantitative T-cell responses and mycobacterial load remains unclear. We hypothesised that, in a HIV-prevalent high burden setting, the magnitude of mycobacterial antigen-specific and non-specific T-cell IFN-γ responses would correlate with (a) bacterial load and (b) culture conversion in patients undergoing treatment.We compared baseline (n = 147), 2 (n = 35) and 6 month (n = 13) purified-protein-derivative (PPD) and RD1-specific (TSPOT.TB and QFT-GIT) blood RD1-specific (TSPOT.TB; QFT-GIT) responses with associates of sputum bacillary load in patients with culture-confirmed TB in Cape Town, South Africa.IFN-γ responses were not associated with liquid culture time-to-positivity, smear-grade, Xpert MTB/RIF-generated cycle threshold values or the presence of cavities on the chest radiograph in patients with culture-confirmed TB and irrespective of HIV-status. 2-month IGRA conversion rates (positive-to-negative) were negligible [<11% for TSPOT.TB (3/28) and QFT-GIT (1/29)] and lower compared to culture [60% (21/35); p<0.01].In a high burden HIV-prevalent setting T-cell IFN-γ responses to M. tuberculosis-specific and non-specific antigens do not correlate with bacillary load, including Xpert MTB/RIF-generated C(T) values, and are therefore poorly suited for monitoring treatment and prognostication.Rapid molecular detection of extrapulmonary tuberculosis by the automated GeneXpert MTB/RIF system.In total, 521 nonrespiratory specimens (91 urine, 30 gastric aspirate, 245 tissue, 113 pleural fluid, 19 cerebrospinal fluid [CSF], and 23 stool specimens) submitted to the German National Reference Laboratory for Mycobacteria (NRL) from May 2009 to August 2010 were comparatively investigated with the new molecular-based GeneXpert MTB/RIF (Xpert) assay system and conventional liquid and solid culture methods. Twenty (3.8%) of the 521 specimens gave no interpretable result. Whereas the sensitivity of the Xpert assay with tissue specimens was 69.0% (20 out of 29 culture-positive cases detected), 100% sensitivity was found with the urine and stool specimens. The combined sensitivity and specificity of the Xpert assay were calculated to be 77.3% and 98.2%, respectively.[Treatment and diagnostics of tuberculosis: moving slowly forward].Development of new drugs for the treatment of drug sensitive and drug resistant tuberculosis is badly needed. Substantial progress has been made in the field and presently six new drug components are in clinical phase I and II trials. Drugs approved for other indications e.g. newer fluoroquinolones and oxazolidinones are also being assessed in human phase II and III trials. Efforts are made to develop easy-to-handle diagnostic tools that will allow early detection of potential MDR or XDR cases. The Xpert RIF/MTB is a prototype of such an invention. At long last the field is moving slowly forward.Xpert MTB/RIF test for tuberculosis.Xpert MTB/RIF test for tuberculosis.Rapid diagnosis of pediatric intrathoracic tuberculosis from stool samples using the Xpert MTB/RIF Assay: a pilot study.Evaluation of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay at a tertiary care referral hospital in a setting where tuberculosis and HIV infection are highly endemic.BACKGROUND. There were 1.45 million deaths from tuberculosis in 2011. A substantial proportion of active pulmonary tuberculosis cases in countries where tuberculosis, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection, and AIDS are highly endemic remain undiagnosed because of the reliance on sputum-smear microscopy. This study evaluated the performance of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay at a tertiary care referral center in Zambia, a country where the burden of tuberculosis and HIV infection is high. METHODS. A total of 881 adult inpatients admitted to University Teaching Hospital in Lusaka who were able to produce sputum were enrolled and analyzed in the study, irrespective of admission diagnosis. Sputum specimens were analyzed by fluorescence smear microscopy, the Xpert MTB/RIF assay, mycobacterial growth indicator tube (MGIT) culture,and MGIT drug-susceptibility testing. The sensitivity and specificity of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay were evaluated using culture as the gold standard. RESULTS. Culture-confirmed tuberculosis was found in 201 of 881 patients (22.8%). The specificity of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay was 95.0% (95% confidence interval [CI], 92.4%–96.8%),and the sensitivity was 86.1% (95% CI, 80.3%–90.4%). In sputum smear–negative, culture-positive cases, the assay was 74.7% sensitive (95% CI, 64.6%–82.8%), identifying 71 additional tuberculosis cases that were not detected by smear microscopy.A total of 18 of 111 patients with tuberculosis who were tested (16.2%) had multidrug-resistant (MDR) tuberculosis.The sensitivity and specificity of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for detecting culture-confirmed, rifampicin-resistant tuberculosis was 81.3% (95% CI, 53.7%–95.0%) and 97.5% (95% CI,90.4%–99.6%), respectively. CONCLUSIONS. The Xpert MTB/RIF assay performs better than smear microscopy in an inpatient setting in a country where tuberculosis and HIV infection are highly endemic. Assessment of its usefulness and cost-effectiveness for increased detection of tuberculosis cases missed by sputum smear and for concomitant screening for MDR tuberculosis among adult inpatients attending tertiary care referral centers in other countries with a high burden of tuberculosis and HIV infection is warranted [corrected].The diagnostic accuracy of urine-based Xpert MTB/RIF in HIV-infected hospitalized patients who are smear-negative or sputum scarce.Hospitals in sub-Saharan Africa are inundated with HIV-infected patients and tuberculosis (TB) is the commonest opportunistic infection in this sub-group. Up to one third of TB-HIV co-infected patients fail to produce a sputum sample (sputum scarce) and diagnosis is thus often delayed or missed. We investigated the sensitivity of urine-based methods (Xpert MTB/RIF, LAM strip test and LAM ELISA) in such patients.281 HIV-infected hospitalised patients with clinically suspected TB provided a spot urine sample. The reference standard was culture positivity for Mycobacterium tuberculosis on ≥1 sputum or extra-pulmonary sample. MTB/RIF was performed using 1 ml of both unprocessed and, when possible, concentrated urine. Each unconcentrated urine sample was also tested using the Clearview LAM ELISA and Alere LAM strip test. 42% (116/242) of patients had culture-proven TB. 18% (20/54) were sputum scarce. In sputum-scarce patients, the sensitivity of urine MTB/RIF and LAM ELISA was 40% (95%CI: 22-61) and 60% (95%CI: 39-78), respectively. Urine MTB/RIF specificity was 98% (95%CI: 95-100). Combined sensitivity of urine LAM ELISA and MTB/RIF was better than MTB/RIF alone [MTB/RIF and LAM: 70% (95%CI: 48-85) vs. MTB/RIF: 40% (95%CI: 22-61), p = 0.03]. Significant predictors of urine MTB/RIF positivity were CD4<50 cells/ml (p = 0.001), elevated protein-to-creatinine ratio (p<0.001) and LAM ELISA positivity (p<0.001). Urine centrifugation and pelleting significantly increased the sensitivity of MTB/RIF over unprocessed urine in paired samples [42% (95%CI: 26-58) vs. 8% (95%CI: 0-16), p<0.001]. Urine MTB/RIF-generated C(T) values correlated poorly with markers of bacillary burden (smear grade and time-to-positivity).This preliminary study indicates that urine-based MTB/RIF, alone or in combination with LAM antigen detection, may potentially aid the diagnosis of TB in HIV-infected patients with advanced immunosuppression when sputum-based diagnosis is not possible. Concentration of urine prior to MTB/RIF-testing significantly improves sensitivity.Increased and expedited case detection by Xpert MTB/RIF assay in childhood tuberculosis: a prospective cohort study.Diagnosis and timely treatment of tuberculosis in children is hampered by the absence of fast and reliable tests, especially in the era of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic performance of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay (Xpert) in children with suspected tuberculosis in a high tuberculosis/HIV-burden setting.In a prospective study with a minimum follow-up of 12 months, 164 children with suspected tuberculosis were assigned to predefined diagnostic subgroups, based on microbiological and clinical findings. Results of smear microscopy and culture were compared against diagnostic performance of Xpert.Twenty-eight of 164 children (17.1%) had confirmed tuberculosis. Xpert detected 100% (95% confidence interval [CI], 59.0%-100%) of smear-positive cases and 66.6% (95% CI, 43.0%-85.4%) of culture-positive but smear-negative cases. In the per-sample analysis, Xpert displayed a similar sensitivity (54.7% [95% CI, 42.7%-66.2%]) compared with culture methods. Xpert detected 3-fold more confirmed tuberculosis cases than smear microscopy but with equal rapidity. Four additional cases (8.5%) with clinical tuberculosis but negative culture were diagnosed by Xpert. Testing second and third samples increased sensitivity by 20% and an additional 16%, respectively. When tuberculosis was reliably excluded, Xpert's specificity was 100%. HIV infection did not affect diagnostic accuracy of Xpert.Xpert was easy to perform and displayed similar diagnostic accuracy as culture methods in children with suspected tuberculosis. Rapid turnaround times should reduce treatment delay and improve patient outcome, although sensitivity remains suboptimal and access is dependent on local laboratory infrastructure.GeneXpert--a game-changer for tuberculosis control?Is scale-up worth it? Challenges in economic analysis of diagnostic tests for tuberculosis.David Dowdy and colleagues discuss the complexities of costing new TB diagnostic tests, including GeneXpert, and argue that flexible analytic tools are needed for decision-makers to adapt large-sample cost-effectiveness data to local conditions.A multisite assessment of the quantitative capabilities of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay.The Xpert MTB/RIF is an automated molecular test for Mycobacterium tuberculosis that estimates bacterial burden by measuring the threshold-cycle (Ct) of its M. tuberculosis-specific real-time polymerase chain reaction. Bacterial burden is an important biomarker for disease severity, infection control risk, and response to therapy.Evaluate bacterial load quantitation by Xpert MTB/RIF compared with conventional quantitative methods.Xpert MTB/RIF results were compared with smear-microscopy, semiquantiative solid culture, and time-to-detection in liquid culture for 741 patients and 2,008 samples tested in a multisite clinical trial. An internal control real-time polymerase chain reaction was evaluated for its ability to identify inaccurate quantitative Xpert MTB/RIF results.Assays with an internal control Ct greater than 34 were likely to be inaccurately quantitated; this represented 15% of M. tuberculosis-positive tests. Excluding these, decreasing M. tuberculosis Ct was associated with increasing smear microscopy grade for smears of concentrated sputum pellets (r(s) = -0.77) and directly from sputum (r(s) =-0.71). A Ct cutoff of approximately 27.7 best predicted smear-positive status. The association between M. tuberculosis Ct and time-to-detection in liquid culture (r(s) = 0.68) and semiquantitative colony counts (r(s) = -0.56) was weaker than smear. Tests of paired same-patient sputum showed that high viscosity sputum samples contained ×32 more M. tuberculosis than nonviscous samples. Comparisons between the grade of the acid-fast bacilli smear and Xpert MTB/RIF quantitative data across study sites enabled us to identify a site outlier in microscopy.Xpert MTB/RIF quantitation offers a new, standardized approach to measuring bacterial burden in the sputum of patients with tuberculosis.Delay in commencing treatment for MDR TB at a specialised TB treatment centre in KwaZulu-Natal.Background. According to the National Department of Health (NDoH) guidelines, patients diagnosed with MDR TB must be referred to a specialised treatment centre for initiation of effective therapy. MDR TB is difficult to diagnose and the centralised referral model is beset with challenges that contribute to treatment delays, increased patient morbidity and mortality, and MDR TB nosocomial transmission. Culture and DST takes 8 weeks or longer to obtain results while line probe assays (LPAs) can give a result in hours. LPAs and the GeneXpert MTB/Rif (GX) are ground-breaking discoveries for TB diagnosis. However, they are not easily accessible or available to those needing it, so culture and sensitivity testing remains the gold standard for diagnosis. Aim. This study aimed to assess the delay in the initiation of MDR TB treatment and profiled the patients being referred to a specialised drug-resistant treatment centre in KwaZulu-Natal. Results. Of all the patients, 75% referred showed a mean delay of 12.4 weeks from the date of sputum collection for culture and drug sensitivity testing to the start of treatment. Most of the patients were symptomatic for TB and HIV-positive. Discussion. Our findings suggest that current policy on the initiation of effective treatment needs urgent revision. Staff should be appropriately trained in LPA and GX technology to reduce delays in initiating treatment for MDR TB. The NDoH's plans for rapid diagnosis and reducing the treatment burden on centralised MDR TB management facilities are in the early phases of implementation and will take years to achieve favourable and significant outcomes. Conclusion. There is a significant delay in initiating definitive management for MDR TB.The use of an automated quantitative polymerase chain reaction (Xpert MTB/RIF) to predict the sputum smear status of tuberculosis patients.Xpert MTB/RIF-generated cycle-threshold (C(T)) values have poor clinical utility as a rule-in test for smear positivity (cut-point ≤20.2; sensitivity 32.3%, specificity 97.1%) but moderately good rule-out value (cut-point >31.8; negative predictive value 80.0%). Thus, 20% of individuals with C(T) values >31.8 were erroneously ruled out as smear-negative. This group had a significantly lower sputum bacillary load relative to correctly classified smear-positive patients (C(T) ≤ 31.8; P < .001). These data inform on public health and contact tracing strategies.Xpert MTB/RIF test for tuberculosis.Rapid implementation of new TB diagnostic tests: is it too soon for a global roll-out of Xpert MTB/RIF?In 2011 the World Health Organization approved Xpert MTB/RIF for tuberculosis diagnosis and recommended its rapid implementation. Xpert MTB/RIF is accurate: sensitivity is 72.5 -98.2% (smear-negative and -positive cases, respectively) and specificity 99.2%. Benefits include same-day diagnosis and simultaneous detection of rifampicin resistance. However, the test has some shortcomings and has not had time for thorough evaluation. Cost-effectiveness studies are difficult to perform and few have been completed. Existing data suggest cost-effectiveness in some, but not all, settings. The urgent need for better diagnostics is evident. Yet, serial implementation of new technologies causes ineffective spending and fragmentation of services. How new tests are incorporated into existing diagnostic algorithms affects both outcomes and costs. More detailed data on performance, effect on patient-important outcomes, and costs when used with adjunct tests are needed for each setting before implementation. While awaiting further clarification it seems prudent to slow its implementation among resource-constrained tuberculosis control programs.Rapid molecular detection of tuberculosis.High diagnostic yield of tuberculosis from screening urine samples from HIV-infected patients with advanced immunodeficiency using the Xpert MTB/RIF assay.We determined the diagnostic yield of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for tuberculosis (TB) when testing small volumes of urine from ambulatory HIV-infected patients before starting antiretroviral therapy in South Africa. Compared with a gold standard of sputum culture, the sensitivity of urine Xpert among those with CD4 cell counts of <50, 50-100, and >100 cells per microliter were 44.4%, 25.0%, and 2.7% (P = 0.001), respectively. Urine Xpert testing provides a means of rapid TB diagnosis in patients with advanced immunodeficiency and poor prognosis. These data are indicative of high rates of TB dissemination and renal involvement in this clinical population.Do adjunct tuberculosis tests, when combined with Xpert MTB/RIF, improve accuracy and the cost of diagnosis in a resource-poor setting?Information regarding the utility of adjunct diagnostic tests in combination with Xpert MTB/RIF (Cepheid, Sunnyvale, CA, USA) is limited. We hypothesised adjunct tests could enhance accuracy and/or reduce the cost of tuberculosis (TB) diagnosis prior to MTB/RIF testing, and rule-in or rule-out TB in MTB/RIF-negative individuals. We assessed the accuracy and/or laboratory-associated cost of diagnosis of smear microscopy, chest radiography (CXR) and interferon-γ release assays (IGRAs; T-SPOT-TB (Oxford Immunotec, Oxford, UK) and QuantiFERON-TB Gold In-Tube (Cellestis, Chadstone, Australia)) combined with MTB/RIF for TB in 480 patients in South Africa. When conducted prior to MTB/RIF: 1) smear microscopy followed by MTB/RIF (if smear negative) had the lowest cost of diagnosis of any strategy investigated; 2) a combination of smear microscopy, CXR (if smear negative) and MTB/RIF (if imaging compatible with active TB) did not further reduce the cost per TB case diagnosed; and 3) a normal CXR ruled out TB in 18% of patients (57 out of 324; negative predictive value (NPV) 100%). When downstream adjunct tests were applied to MTB/RIF-negative individuals, radiology ruled out TB in 24% (56 out of 234; NPV 100%), smear microscopy ruled in TB in 21% (seven out of 24) of culture-positive individuals and IGRAs were not useful in either context. In resource-poor settings, smear microscopy combined with MTB/RIF had the highest accuracy and lowest cost of diagnosis compared to either technique alone. In MTB/RIF-negative individuals, CXR has poor rule-in value but can reliably rule out TB in approximately one in four cases. These data inform upon the programmatic utility of MTB/RIF in high-burden settings.Comparison of two molecular methods for rapid diagnosis of extrapulmonary tuberculosis.Application of real-time PCR for the detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis enables results to be obtained in about 2 h. A total of 340 nonrespiratory samples were processed using two real-time PCR assay kits: Xpert MTB/RIF and Cobas TaqMan MTB. The sensitivity and specificity of the Xpert assay were 95% and 100%, respectively, compared to 78% and 98% for the Cobas assay.Comparison of the Xpert MTB/RIF test with an IS6110-TaqMan real-time PCR assay for direct detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in respiratory and nonrespiratory specimens.The sensitivities of the Xpert MTB/RIF test and an in-house IS6110-based real-time PCR using TaqMan probes (IS6110-TaqMan assay) for the detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex (MTBC) DNA were compared by use of 117 clinical specimens (97 culture positive and 20 culture negative for MTBC) that were frozen in sediment. The 97 clinical specimens included 60 respiratory and 37 nonrespiratory specimens distributed into 36 smear-positive and 61 smear-negative specimens. Among the 97 culture-positive specimens, 4 had rifampin-resistant isolates. Both methods were highly specific and exhibited excellent sensitivity (100%) with smear-positive specimens. The sensitivity of the Xpert MTB/RIF test with the whole smear-negative specimens was more reduced than that of the IS6110-TaqMan assay (48 versus 69%, P = 0.005). Both methods exhibited similar sensitivities with smear-negative respiratory specimens, but the Xpert MTB/RIF test had lower sensitivity with smear-negative nonrespiratory specimens than the IS6110-TaqMan assay (37 versus 71%, P = 0.013). Finally, the sensitivities of the Xpert MTB/RIF test and the IS6110-TaqMan assay were 79% and 84%, respectively, with respiratory specimens and 53% and 78%, respectively (P = 0.013), with nonrespiratory specimens. The Xpert MTB/RIF test correctly detected the rifampin resistance in smear-positive specimens but not in the one smear-negative specimen. The Xpert MTB/RIF test is a simple rapid method well adapted to a routine laboratory that appeared to be as sensitive as the IS6110-TaqMan assay with respiratory specimens but less sensitive with paucibacillary specimens, such as smear-negative nonrespiratory specimens.Characteristics and early outcomes of patients with Xpert MTB/RIF-negative pulmonary tuberculosis diagnosed during screening before antiretroviral therapy.A proportion of patients with tuberculosis diagnosed by sputum culture during screening before antiretroviral therapy (ART) have false-negative Xpert MTB/RIF assay results (Xpert-negative tuberculosis). We determined the characteristics and early ART program outcomes of such patients.Adult patients who enrolled in a South African township ART service were systematically screened for pulmonary tuberculosis regardless of symptoms by testing paired sputum samples with Xpert MTB/RIF and liquid culture. The ART service provided follow-up for all patients, and early (90-day) programmatic outcomes were determined.Among 602 patients screened, 523 had ≥1 Xpert and culture result, yielding 89 culture-positive tuberculosis diagnoses. Of these, 37 (42%) of the patients with tuberculosis were Xpert-negative when a single sputum sample was tested, compared with 25 (28%) when 2 samples were tested. Compared with patients with Xpert-positive tuberculosis, those with Xpert-negative tuberculosis (using either definition) had substantially higher CD4 cell counts, lower plasma viral loads, higher hemoglobin concentrations, and higher body mass index. Their tuberculosis was also less advanced, with a lower frequency of prolonged cough (≥2 weeks), less extensive radiographic abnormalities, and a lower frequency of detectable lipoarabinomannan antigenuria and mycobacteriuria. Xpert-negative cases were all sputum smear negative with prolonged time to culture positivity (median, 21 days). Despite greater delays in starting tuberculosis treatment, Xpert-negative patients were less likely to die during follow-up.Compared to patients with Xpert-positive tuberculosis diagnosed during pre-ART screening, Xpert-negative cases had less advanced immunosuppression and less advanced tuberculosis and did not have adverse outcomes despite substantial delays in starting tuberculosis treatment.Xpert(®) MTB/RIF for point-of-care diagnosis of TB in high-HIV burden, resource-limited countries: hype or hope?Despite the identification of Mycobacterium tuberculosis as the cause of tuberculosis (TB) more than a century ago, diagnosing TB in resource-poor countries remains a challenge, especially in people living with HIV. In the past decade, important research investments have been made towards the development of new diagnostics for TB and the Xpert(®) MTB/RIF assay (Cepheid, CA, USA) has emerged as one of the most promising. In this article, we review the current knowledge on Xpert MTB/RIF, discuss the potential value of Xpert MTB/RIF as a point-of-care diagnostic for drug-sensitive and drug-resistant TB, and outline the potential indications for the assay in resource-limited, high-HIV burden settings. We also discuss key research questions that need to be addressed prior to possible large-scale implementation of the assay.Clinical failures associated with rpoB mutations in phenotypically occult multidrug-resistant Mycobacterium tuberculosis.Recently, Mycobacterium tuberculosis isolates have been described that test phenotypically susceptible to rifampicin (RMP) yet harbour genotypic rpoB mutations.1) To investigate the impact of such mutations on clinical outcomes among RMP-susceptible isolates, and 2) to determine the prevalence of rpoB mutations among isoniazid (INH) monoresistant isolates at our laboratory and to describe the association between the presence of these mutations and clinical outcomes.M. tuberculosis isolates were screened for mutations in the rpoB gene using the Cepheid Gene-Xpert® MTB/RIF assay. Clinical correlation was made by reviewing patient case notes.Isolates from 94 patients were found to have INH-resistant, RMP-susceptible profiles. Clinical information was available for 52 patients, including three whose isolates had rpoB mutations. All three of these patients had treatment failures, compared to two of 49 patients whose isolates did not have rpoB mutations (P = 0.0005).We demonstrate a significant association between the presence of rpoB gene mutations that are not detected at the current RMP critical concentration and treatment failure. We suggest that a review of the current RMP critical concentration is warranted to ensure that RMP is not used inappropriately for the treatment of phenotypically occult multidrug-resistant tuberculosis.Xpert® MTB/RIF diagnosed disseminated smear-negative MDR-TB in a sub-district hospital in India.Performance characteristics of the Cepheid Xpert MTB/RIF test in a tuberculosis prevalence survey.Xpert MTB/RIF ("Xpert") is a molecular test for detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis (MTB) in sputum. Performance characteristics have been established for its use during passive tuberculosis (TB) case detection in symptomatic TB suspects, but Xpert performance has not been assessed in other settings. Objectives were to determine Xpert performance and costs in the context of a TB prevalence survey.This was a diagnostic sub-study of a TB prevalence survey conducted in gold mining companies in South Africa. Sputa (one per participant) were tested using smear microscopy, liquid culture (reference comparator), and Xpert. Costs were collected using an ingredients approach and analyzed using a public health program perspective. 6893 participants provided a sputum specimen. 187/6893 (2.7%) were positive for MTB in culture, 144/6893 (2.1%) were positive for MTB by Xpert, and 91/6893 (1.3%) were positive for acid fast bacilli by microsocopy. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for detection of MTB by Xpert were 62.6% (95% confidence interval [CI] 55.2, 69.5), 99.6% (99.4, 99.7), 81.3% (73.9, 87.3), and 98.9 (98.6, 98.8); agreement between Xpert and culture was 98.5% (98.2, 98.8). Sensitivity of microscopy was 17.6% (12.5, 23.9). When individuals with a history of TB treatment were excluded from the analysis, Xpert specificity was 99.8 (99.7, 99.9) and PPV was 90.6 (83.3, 95.4) for detection of MTB. For the testing scenario of 7000 specimens with 2.7% of specimens culture positive for MTB, costs were $165,690 for Xpert and $115,360 for the package of microscopy plus culture.In the context of a TB prevalence survey, the Xpert diagnostic yield was substantially higher than that of microscopy yet lower than that of liquid culture. Xpert may be useful as a sole test for TB case detection in prevalence surveys, particularly in settings lacking capacity for liquid culture.Impact of Xpert MTB/RIF testing on tuberculosis management and outcomes in hospitalized patients in Uganda.The clinical impact of Xpert MTB/RIF for tuberculosis (TB) diagnosis in high HIV-prevalence settings is unknown.To determine the diagnostic accuracy and impact of Xpert MTB/RIF among high-risk TB suspects.WE PROSPECTIVELY ENROLLED CONSECUTIVE, HOSPITALIZED, UGANDAN TB SUSPECTS IN TWO PHASES: baseline phase in which Xpert MTB/RIF results were not reported to clinicians and an implementation phase in which results were reported. We determined the diagnostic accuracy of Xpert MTB/RIF in reference to culture (solid and liquid) and compared patient outcomes by study phase.477 patients were included (baseline phase 287, implementation phase 190). Xpert MTB/RIF had high sensitivity (187/237, 79%, 95% CI: 73-84%) and specificity (190/199, 96%, 95% CI: 92-98%) for culture-positive TB overall, but sensitivity was lower (34/81, 42%, 95% CI: 31-54%) among smear-negative TB cases. Xpert MTB/RIF reduced median days-to-TB detection for all TB cases (1 [IQR 0-26] vs. 0 [IQR 0-1], p<0.001), and for smear-negative TB (35 [IQR 22-55] vs. 22 [IQR 0-33], p=0.001). However, median days-to-TB treatment was similar for all TB cases (1 [IQR 0-5] vs. 0 [IQR 0-2], p=0.06) and for smear-negative TB (7 [IQR 3-53] vs. 6 [IQR 1-61], p=0.78). Two-month mortality was also similar between study phases among 252 TB cases (17% vs. 14%, difference +3%, 95% CI: -21% to +27%, p=0.80), and among 87 smear-negative TB cases (28% vs. 22%, difference +6%, 95% CI: -34 to +46%, p=0.77).Xpert MTB/RIF facilitated more accurate and earlier TB diagnosis, leading to a higher proportion of TB suspects with a confirmed TB diagnosis prior to hospital discharge in a high HIV/low MDR TB prevalence setting. However, our study did not detect a decrease in two-month mortality following implementation of Xpert MTB/RIF possibly because of insufficient powering, differences in empiric TB treatment rates, and disease severity between study phases.Rapid molecular diagnosis of pulmonary tuberculosis in children using nasopharyngeal specimens.A rapid diagnosis of pediatric pulmonary tuberculosis (PTB) using Xpert MTB/RIF (Mycobacterium tuberculosis/rifampicin) automated testing on induced sputum (IS) is possible, but the capacity for performing IS is limited. The diagnosis using a nasopharyngeal aspirate (NPA), which can be non-invasively obtained, is desirable.Paired specimens (NPA and IS) were tested using smear, liquid culture and Xpert. The diagnostic accuracy of Xpert and smear was compared with culture for different specimens in children with suspected PTB.There were 535 children [median age 19 months, 117 (21·9%) HIV-infected] who had one IS and one NPA specimen; 396 had two paired specimens. A positive smear, Xpert test or culture occurred in 30 (5.6%), 81 (15.1%) and 87 children (16.3%), respectively. The culture yield was higher from IS (84/87, 96.6%) vs NPA (61/87, 70.1%, P < .001). Amongst children with two paired specimens, 63 culture-confirmed cases occurred [60 (95.2%) IS vs 48 (76.2%) NPA, P = .002]. The sensitivity of two Xpert tests was similar for IS and NPAs [(45/63) 71% vs (41/63) 65%, P = .444)]; the sensitivity of smear was lower for IS (21/63, 33%) and NPA (16/63, 25%). The incremental yield from a second IS was 9 cases (17.6%) by culture and 9 (25%) by Xpert testing; a second NPA increased the culture yield by 10 (26.3%) and Xpert by 11 (36.7%). Xpert specificity was 99.1% (98.1-100) for IS and 98.2% (96.8-99.6) for NPAs. Xpert testing provided faster results than culture (median 0 vs 15 days, P < .001).Xpert testing on 2 NPAs is useful in children with suspected PTB, particularly in settings where IS and culture are not feasible.Performance of the Xpert® MTB/RIF assay in an active case-finding strategy: a pilot study from Tanzania.In this pilot study, we evaluated the Xpert® MTB/RIF assay in an active case-finding strategy, using two spot sputum samples collected within a 1-hour interval from household contacts of smear-positive TB index cases. Tuberculosis (TB) confirmed by culture served as the reference standard. Among 219 enrolled contacts, the yield of active TB was 2.3%. While the sensitivity of smear microscopy was 60% (95%CI 14.7-94.7), Xpert MTB/RIF achieved a sensitivity of 100% (95%CI 47.81-100.0). All culture-confirmed cases tested positive by Xpert MTB/RIF on the first submitted sample, suggesting that the evaluation of only one sample could be sufficient for TB diagnosis in this context.Evaluation of Xpert MTB/RIF and MODS assay for the diagnosis of pediatric tuberculosis.Tuberculosis (TB) in children is rarely confirmed due to the lack of effective diagnostic tools; only 10 to 15% of pediatric TB is smear positive due to paucibacillary samples and the difficulty of obtaining high-quality specimens from children. We evaluate here the accuracy of Xpert MTB/RIF in comparison with the Micoroscopic observation drug susceptibility (MODS) assay for diagnosis of TB in children using samples stored during a previously reported evaluation of the MODS assay.Ninety-six eligible children presenting with suspected TB were recruited consecutively at Pham Ngoc Thach Hospital in Ho Chi Minh City Viet Nam between May to December 2008 and tested by Ziehl-Neelsen smear, MODS and Mycobacterial growth Indicator (MGIT, Becton Dickinson) culture. All samples sent by the treating clinician for testing were included in the analysis. An aliquot of processed sample deposit was stored at -20°C and tested in the present study by Xpert MTB/RIF test. 183 samples from 73 children were available for analysis by Xpert. Accuracy measures of MODS and Xpert were summarized.The sensitivity (%) in detecting children with a clinical diagnosis of TB for smear, MODS and Xpert were 37.9 [95% CI 25.5; 51.6], 51.7 [38.2; 65.0] and 50.0 [36.6; 63.4], respectively (per patient analysis). Xpert was significantly more sensitive than smear (P=0.046). Testing of additional samples did not increase case detection for MODS while testing of a second sputum sample by Xpert detected only two additional cases. The positive and negative predictive values (%) of Xpert were 100.0 [88.0; 100.0] and 34.1 [20.5; 49.9], respectively, while those of MODS were 96.8 [83.3; 99.9] and 33.3 [19.6; 49.5].MODS culture and Xpert MTB/RIF test have similar sensitivities for the detection of pediatric TB. Xpert MTB RIF is able to detect tuberculosis and rifampicin resistance within two hours. MODS allows isolation of cultures for further drug susceptibility testing but requires approximately one week to become positive. Testing of multiple samples by xpert detected only two additional cases and the benefits must be considered against costs in each setting. Further research is required to evaluate the optimal integration of Xpert into pediatric testing algorithms.Can a simple flotation method lower the limit of detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in extrapulmonary samples analyzed by the GeneXpert MTB/RIF assay?The rapid and accurate diagnosis of tuberculosis (TB) in children and extrapulmonary TB in adults continues to be a challenge. In this study, we determined the lower limit of detection (LOD) of the GeneXpert MTB/RIF assay with nonrespiratory specimens and investigated the utility of flotation procedures for concentrating the bacilli. Clinical specimens (9 cerebrospinal fluid [CSF], 13 gastric aspirate, 8 tissue, and 17 stool) were spiked with single-celled Mycobacterium tuberculosis, and the LOD of the GeneXpert assay was determined. Flotation studies were conducted with sucrose and NaCl, and the cycle thresholds of the MTB/RIF assay were compared between treated and untreated samples. There was no significant difference between the LODs of the GeneXpert assay with saline solution (median, 33 CFU/ml) and CSF (median, 25 CFU/ml) (P > 0.05) or gastric aspirate samples (median, 58 CFU/ml) (P > 0.05). The LOD with spiked tissue (median, 1,525 CFU/ml) and stool samples (median, 6,800 CFU/ml) was significantly elevated compared to that determined with saline solution (P ≤ 0.05 and ≤ 0.0005, respectively). Flotation studies with sucrose or NaCl did not consistently result in lowered cycle thresholds in stool or gastric aspirates, but a cycle reduction of >10 was achieved in two of the three pooled CSF samples. Unlike the results seen with tissue and stool samples, there was no significant PCR inhibition in the MTB/RIF assay with CSF and gastric aspirates. Although preconcentration of CSF samples with sucrose and NaCl may enhance detection of M. tuberculosis by PCR, further advances are needed to concentrate the bacilli and eliminate PCR inhibitors in paucibacillary nonrespiratory samples.Xpert MTB/RIF: a new pillar in diagnosis of extrapulmonary tuberculosis?Approximately 10 to 15% of tuberculosis (TB) cases in India are estimated to have extrapulmonary disease, and due to a lack of diagnostic means, they often remain untreated. The early detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis and multidrug resistance is a priority in TB diagnosis to improve the successful treatment rate of TB and reduce transmission. The Xpert MTB/RIF (Xpert) test, recently endorsed by the World Health Organization for the detection of pulmonary TB, was evaluated to test its utility in 547 patients with suspected extrapulmonary tuberculosis. Five hundred forty-seven extrapulmonary specimens were split and processed simultaneously for both culture (solid and liquid) and Xpert testing. For culture, the sensitivity was low, 53% (150/283 specimens). Xpert sensitivity and specificity results were assessed in comparison to a composite reference standard made up of smear and culture results and clinical, radiological, and histological findings. The sensitivity of the Xpert assay was 81% (228/283 specimens) (64% [89/138] for smear-negative cases and 96% [139/145] for smear-positive cases), with a specificity of 99.6%. The sensitivity was found to be high for the majority of specimen types (63 to 100%) except for cerebrospinal fluid, the sensitivity of which was 29% (2/7 specimens). The Xpert test correctly identified 98% of phenotypic rifampin (RIF)-resistant cases and 94% of phenotypic RIF-susceptible cases. Sequencing of the 6 discrepant samples resolved 3 of them, resulting in an increased specificity of 98%. In conclusion, the results of this study suggest that the Xpert test also shows good potential for the diagnosis of extrapulmonary TB and that its ease of use makes it applicable for countries where TB is endemic.The urgent need for new diagnostics for symptomatic tuberculosis in children.TB is a major public health problem causing 9 million cases, of which 10%-15% occur in children each year. Historically, children have received lower priority within TB control activities because they are considered less infectious than smear-positive adults. This review argues that TB is a public health problem in children and that poor awareness of the magnitude of the problem emanates from the lack of suitable pediatric diagnostic tests for TB and the characteristics of the disease in young children. New TB diagnostics, approved for use in adults have not been evaluated in children, although there is limited evidence that some of these tests hold promise and should be assessed. There are several approaches that could be used to improve the performance of tests in pediatric patients. These include improved methods for specimen collection and processing. The value of collecting specimens from multiple anatomical sites to shorten the diagnostic process and improve sensitivity was reported recently and the combination of expectorated sputum, nasopharyngeal aspirate, induce sputum and gastric aspirate may result in a similar yield than specimens collected over consecutive days. Methods for sample collection such as fine needle aspiration biopsy should be used more frequently and the Microscopic Observation Drug Sensitivity (MODS) assay has higher sensitivity than LJ culture. There is however very scanty evidence of the performance of other promising tests such as the fully automated NAAT (Xpert) and Line Probe Assays and loop mediated isothermal amplification. Although the future holds promise, increased support from international organizations and funding agencies is needed to promote the evaluation and development of new diagnostics that are suitable for TB in children.Effectiveness of an integrated real-time PCR method for detection of the Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex in smear-negative extrapulmonary samples in an area of low tuberculosis prevalence.Early extrapulmonary tuberculosis (EPTB) diagnosis is particularly difficult. Among 108 smear-negative extrapulmonary samples showing a positive culture for Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex (43 body fluids and 65 nonliquid specimens), 63 (58.3%) were positive with the Xpert MTB/RIF assay (GX). GX sensitivity was quite low for samples from sterile locations (especially for pleural fluids: 26.9%) but high for some nonliquid samples, like abscess aspirates (76.5%). In summary, GX may be a useful tool to be considered for EPTB diagnosis.Antigen detection as a point-of-care test for TB: the case of lipoarabinomannan.The limitations of sputum smear microscopy, routine chest radiology for HIV-associated TB and culture-based diagnosis are well recognized, especially in resource-limited settings. The diagnostic accuracy of a new point-of-care lateral-flow urine strip test for lipoarabinomannan (Determine(®) TB-LAM; Alere, MA, USA), which costs US$3.50 per test strip and provides results within 30 min, was evaluated in a cohort of South African patients for HIV-associated TB before starting anti-retroviral therapy in South Africa. Prevalence of culture-positive TB cases was 17.4%, among which 28.2% had sputum smear positivity. Determine(®) TB-LAM (Alere, MA, USA) had highest sensitivity at low CD4 cell counts: 66.7, 51.7 and 39.0% at <50 cells, <100 cells and <200 cells per µl, respectively; specificity was greater than 98% for all strata. There was an incremental sensitivity when Determine TB-LAM was combined with smear microscopy, which did not differ statistically from the sensitivities obtained by testing a single sputum sample with the Xpert(®) MTB/RIF (Cepheid; CA, USA) assay. Determine TB-LAM is a simple, low-cost alternative to existing diagnostic assays for TB screening in HIV-infected patients with very low CD4(+) cell counts.Evaluation of Xpert MTB/RIF and MODS assay for the diagnosis of pediatric tuberculosis.Tuberculosis (TB) in children is rarely confirmed due to the lack of effective diagnostic tools; only 10 to 15% of pediatric TB is smear positive due to paucibacillary samples and the difficulty of obtaining high-quality specimens from children. We evaluate here the accuracy of Xpert MTB/RIF in comparison with the Micoroscopic observation drug susceptibility (MODS) assay for diagnosis of TB in children using samples stored during a previously reported evaluation of the MODS assay.Ninety-six eligible children presenting with suspected TB were recruited consecutively at Pham Ngoc Thach Hospital in Ho Chi Minh City Viet Nam between May to December 2008 and tested by Ziehl-Neelsen smear, MODS and Mycobacterial growth Indicator (MGIT, Becton Dickinson) culture. All samples sent by the treating clinician for testing were included in the analysis. An aliquot of processed sample deposit was stored at -20°C and tested in the present study by Xpert MTB/RIF test. 183 samples from 73 children were available for analysis by Xpert. Accuracy measures of MODS and Xpert were summarized.The sensitivity (%) in detecting children with a clinical diagnosis of TB for smear, MODS and Xpert were 37.9 [95% CI 25.5; 51.6], 51.7 [38.2; 65.0] and 50.0 [36.6; 63.4], respectively (per patient analysis). Xpert was significantly more sensitive than smear (P=0.046). Testing of additional samples did not increase case detection for MODS while testing of a second sputum sample by Xpert detected only two additional cases. The positive and negative predictive values (%) of Xpert were 100.0 [88.0; 100.0] and 34.1 [20.5; 49.9], respectively, while those of MODS were 96.8 [83.3; 99.9] and 33.3 [19.6; 49.5].MODS culture and Xpert MTB/RIF test have similar sensitivities for the detection of pediatric TB. Xpert MTB RIF is able to detect tuberculosis and rifampicin resistance within two hours. MODS allows isolation of cultures for further drug susceptibility testing but requires approximately one week to become positive. Testing of multiple samples by xpert detected only two additional cases and the benefits must be considered against costs in each setting. Further research is required to evaluate the optimal integration of Xpert into pediatric testing algorithms.High diagnostic yield of tuberculosis from screening urine samples from HIV-infected patients with advanced immunodeficiency using the Xpert MTB/RIF assay.We determined the diagnostic yield of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for tuberculosis (TB) when testing small volumes of urine from ambulatory HIV-infected patients before starting antiretroviral therapy in South Africa. Compared with a gold standard of sputum culture, the sensitivity of urine Xpert among those with CD4 cell counts of <50, 50-100, and >100 cells per microliter were 44.4%, 25.0%, and 2.7% (P = 0.001), respectively. Urine Xpert testing provides a means of rapid TB diagnosis in patients with advanced immunodeficiency and poor prognosis. These data are indicative of high rates of TB dissemination and renal involvement in this clinical population.Suitability of Xpert MTB/RIF and genotype MTBDRplus for patient selection for a tuberculosis clinical trial.Participation criteria for clinical trials in pulmonary tuberculosis commonly include confirmation of sputum positive for mycobacteria and an indication of drug susceptibility before treatment is initiated. We investigated the suitability of two novel sputum-based nucleic acid amplification methods for patient selection in a recent early bactericidal activity study. Spontaneously expectorated sputum samples of 140 consecutive pulmonary tuberculosis patients were examined with direct fluorescence microscopy, Genotype MTBDRplus assay (MTBDR), Xpert MTB/RIF assay (Xpert), and liquid mycobacterial culture. The methods detected mycobacteria or mycobacterial DNA in 96.8%, 90.5%, 92.9%, and 92.1% of samples, respectively. MTBDR, Xpert, and liquid culture were 100% concordant for detection of resistance to rifampin. Sensitivity and specificity of MTBDR for detection of isoniazid resistance were 83.3% and 100%, respectively. For quantification of mycobacterial sputum load, we found a correlation between Xpert DNA amplification cycle thresholds, time to positivity, and microscopy smear grade. The best correlation was found between Xpert and time to positivity (r = 0.54), which were both correlated with smear microscopy with r values equal to -0.40 and -0.48, respectively. We conclude that MTBDR and Xpert are suitable screening tools for determining rifampin resistance in sputum microscopy smear-positive patients before participation in tuberculosis trials. Xpert should be further explored as a surrogate measurement for sputum mycobacterial load.Rapid diagnosis of pediatric intrathoracic tuberculosis from stool samples using the Xpert MTB/RIF Assay: a pilot study.Impact of Xpert MTB/RIF testing on tuberculosis management and outcomes in hospitalized patients in Uganda.The clinical impact of Xpert MTB/RIF for tuberculosis (TB) diagnosis in high HIV-prevalence settings is unknown.To determine the diagnostic accuracy and impact of Xpert MTB/RIF among high-risk TB suspects.WE PROSPECTIVELY ENROLLED CONSECUTIVE, HOSPITALIZED, UGANDAN TB SUSPECTS IN TWO PHASES: baseline phase in which Xpert MTB/RIF results were not reported to clinicians and an implementation phase in which results were reported. We determined the diagnostic accuracy of Xpert MTB/RIF in reference to culture (solid and liquid) and compared patient outcomes by study phase.477 patients were included (baseline phase 287, implementation phase 190). Xpert MTB/RIF had high sensitivity (187/237, 79%, 95% CI: 73-84%) and specificity (190/199, 96%, 95% CI: 92-98%) for culture-positive TB overall, but sensitivity was lower (34/81, 42%, 95% CI: 31-54%) among smear-negative TB cases. Xpert MTB/RIF reduced median days-to-TB detection for all TB cases (1 [IQR 0-26] vs. 0 [IQR 0-1], p<0.001), and for smear-negative TB (35 [IQR 22-55] vs. 22 [IQR 0-33], p=0.001). However, median days-to-TB treatment was similar for all TB cases (1 [IQR 0-5] vs. 0 [IQR 0-2], p=0.06) and for smear-negative TB (7 [IQR 3-53] vs. 6 [IQR 1-61], p=0.78). Two-month mortality was also similar between study phases among 252 TB cases (17% vs. 14%, difference +3%, 95% CI: -21% to +27%, p=0.80), and among 87 smear-negative TB cases (28% vs. 22%, difference +6%, 95% CI: -34 to +46%, p=0.77).Xpert MTB/RIF facilitated more accurate and earlier TB diagnosis, leading to a higher proportion of TB suspects with a confirmed TB diagnosis prior to hospital discharge in a high HIV/low MDR TB prevalence setting. However, our study did not detect a decrease in two-month mortality following implementation of Xpert MTB/RIF possibly because of insufficient powering, differences in empiric TB treatment rates, and disease severity between study phases.Xpert® MTB/RIF diagnosed disseminated smear-negative MDR-TB in a sub-district hospital in India.Implementation of Xpert MTB/RIF for routine point-of-care diagnosis of tuberculosis at the primary care level.Xpert MTB/RIF (Xpert) offers rapid detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis and rifampicin resistance. However, little is known about routine point-of-care (POC) use in high TB/HIV burden settings. We describe our experiences of launching Xpert as the POC, initial diagnostic for all TB suspects at a primary healthcare clinic in Johannesburg, South Africa. Noted important benefits of POC Xpert were fewer clinic visits, rapid detection of TB and rifampicin resistance, real-time assessment of accompanying household members of new TB cases, and increased staff motivation for TB screening. While Xpert results are available within 2 hours, actual turn-around time was longer for most patients because of sample preparation time and clinic congestion. Consequently, a GX4 instrument did not result in a 16-test capacity during an 8-hour working day, and some patients did not receive same-day results. Loss to follow-up was an unforeseen challenge, overcome by clinic flow changes, marking of clinic files, documenting patients' physical description and locating patients in the clinic by cell phone. Staff with high school education successfully performed the assay after minimal training. Human resource requirements were considerable, with a minimum of 2 staff needed to supervise sputum collection, process sputum, perform assays, and document results for an average of 15 TB suspects daily. POC placement of the instrument transferred logistical responsibilities to the clinic, including quality assurance, maintenance, stock control and cartridge disposal. POC use of Xpert is feasible at the primary healthcare level but must be accompanied by financial, operational and logistical support.The Xpert® MTB/RIF assay evaluation in South Korea, a country with an intermediate tuberculosis burden.A central hospital laboratory in South Korea.To evaluate the usefulness of the Xpert® MTB/RIF assay in a country with an intermediate tuberculosis burden.A total of 71 real-time polymerase chain reaction-positive sputum sediments were tested within 24 h by the Xpert MTB/RIF assay. Mycobacterium tuberculosis detection was compared with smear microscopy and culture. Rifampicin (RMP) resistance was compared with a culture-based method and rpoB gene sequencing. We also assessed the limit of detection for mutant proportions and time savings in diagnosis.The Xpert MTB/RIF assay detected M. tuberculosis in 71 (100%) specimens (32 smear-positive, 39 smear-negative). This assay showed 100% (62/62) concordance with drug resistance confirmed by culture and 98.4% (61/62) concordance with sequencing. A specimen containing approximately 50% of mutant p.His526Tyr was falsely interpreted as wild-type bacilli by this assay. The minimal detection ratio was 5:1 of mutant vs. wild-type cells. The median time saved was 18.5 days (range 9-30) for the diagnosis of M. tuberculosis and 81.5 days (65-136) for RMP susceptibility in smear-negative, culture-positive patients.The Xpert MTB/RIF assay showed high sensitivity in detecting M. tuberculosis with information on RMP resistance, and had a more rapid time to diagnosis compared to conventional tests; however, the location and amount of mutation may affect test sensitivity.The diagnostic performance of the GenoType MTBDRplus version 2 line probe assay is equivalent to that of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay.Molecular diagnostics for Mycobacterium tuberculosis have recently been endorsed by the World Health Organization. The Xpert MTB/RIF assay was endorsed for use on patient material, regardless of smear gradation, while the GenoType MTBDRplus (version 1) has been limited for use on smear-positive patient material. In this study, we evaluated the diagnostic performance of the Xpert MTB/RIF and GenoType MTBDRplus (version 2) assays on smear-positive and smear-negative patient specimens submitted to a high-throughput diagnostic laboratory. A total of 282 consecutive specimens were subjected to the two new molecular assays, and their performance characteristics were assessed relative to the routine diagnostic standard. Both assays showed similar diagnostic performance characteristics. The sensitivities of the GenoType MTBDRplus (v2.0) and Xpert MTB/RIF assays for the detection of culture-positive M. tuberculosis were 73.1% and 71.2%, respectively, while the specificities of both assays were 100%. Both assays were able to diagnose the presence of M. tuberculosis in 57 to 58% of smear-negative cases, suggesting that the performance characteristics were dependent on bacillary load. The detection of M. tuberculosis in culture-negative specimens confirmed that molecular assays should not be used for treatment monitoring. The sensitivity and specificity for rifampin resistance detection were 100% in both assays; however, the GenoType MTBDRplus (v2.0) assay provided additional information on isoniazid susceptibility. The GenoType MTBDRplus (v2.0) assay will complement the Xpert MTB/RIF screening assay by validating rifampin susceptibility and providing information on isoniazid susceptibility. In addition, the GenoType MTBDRplus (v2.0) assay will provide pharmacogenetic information that may be critical in guiding appropriate treatment.A diagnostic accuracy study of Xpert®MTB/RIF in HIV-positive patients with high clinical suspicion of pulmonary tuberculosis in Lima, Peru.Diagnosis of pulmonary tuberculosis (TB) among human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) patients remains complex and demands easy to perform and accurate tests. Xpert®MTB/RIF (MTB/RIF) is a molecular TB diagnostic test which is rapid and convenient; the test requires minimal human resources and reports results within two hours. The majority of performance studies of MTB/RIF have been performed in high HIV burden settings, thus TB diagnostic studies among HIV patients in low HIV prevalence settings such as Peru are still needed.From April 2010 to May 2011, HIV-positive patients with high clinical suspicion of TB were enrolled from two tertiary hospitals in Lima, Peru. Detection of TB by MTB/RIF was compared to a composite reference standard Löwenstein-Jensen (LJ) and liquid culture. Detection of rifampicin resistance was compared to the LJ proportion method. We included 131 patients, the median CD4 cell count was 154.5 cells/mm(3) and 45 (34.4%) had TB. For TB detection among HIV patients, sensitivity of MTB/RIF was 97.8% (95% CI 88.4-99.6) (44/45); specificity was 97.7% (95% CI 91.9-99.4) (84/86); the positive predictive value was 95.7% (95% CI 85.5-98.8) (44/46); and the negative predictive value, 98.8% (95% CI 93.6-99.8) (84/85). MTB/RIF detected 13/14 smear-negative TB cases, outperforming smear microscopy [97.8% (44/45) vs. 68.9% (31/45); p = 0.0002]. For rifampicin resistance detection, sensitivity of MTB/RIF was 100% (95% CI 61.0-100.0) (6/6); specificity was 91.0% (95% CI 76.4-96.9) (30/33); the positive predictive value was 66.7% (95% CI 35.4-87.9) (6/9); and the negative predictive value was 100% (95% CI 88.7 -100.0) (30/30).In HIV patients in our population with a high clinical suspicion of TB, MTB/RIF performed well for TB diagnosis and outperformed smear microscopy.Performance of the Xpert® MTB/RIF assay in an active case-finding strategy: a pilot study from Tanzania.In this pilot study, we evaluated the Xpert® MTB/RIF assay in an active case-finding strategy, using two spot sputum samples collected within a 1-hour interval from household contacts of smear-positive TB index cases. Tuberculosis (TB) confirmed by culture served as the reference standard. Among 219 enrolled contacts, the yield of active TB was 2.3%. While the sensitivity of smear microscopy was 60% (95%CI 14.7-94.7), Xpert MTB/RIF achieved a sensitivity of 100% (95%CI 47.81-100.0). All culture-confirmed cases tested positive by Xpert MTB/RIF on the first submitted sample, suggesting that the evaluation of only one sample could be sufficient for TB diagnosis in this context.Performance characteristics of the Cepheid Xpert MTB/RIF test in a tuberculosis prevalence survey.Xpert MTB/RIF ("Xpert") is a molecular test for detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis (MTB) in sputum. Performance characteristics have been established for its use during passive tuberculosis (TB) case detection in symptomatic TB suspects, but Xpert performance has not been assessed in other settings. Objectives were to determine Xpert performance and costs in the context of a TB prevalence survey.This was a diagnostic sub-study of a TB prevalence survey conducted in gold mining companies in South Africa. Sputa (one per participant) were tested using smear microscopy, liquid culture (reference comparator), and Xpert. Costs were collected using an ingredients approach and analyzed using a public health program perspective. 6893 participants provided a sputum specimen. 187/6893 (2.7%) were positive for MTB in culture, 144/6893 (2.1%) were positive for MTB by Xpert, and 91/6893 (1.3%) were positive for acid fast bacilli by microsocopy. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for detection of MTB by Xpert were 62.6% (95% confidence interval [CI] 55.2, 69.5), 99.6% (99.4, 99.7), 81.3% (73.9, 87.3), and 98.9 (98.6, 98.8); agreement between Xpert and culture was 98.5% (98.2, 98.8). Sensitivity of microscopy was 17.6% (12.5, 23.9). When individuals with a history of TB treatment were excluded from the analysis, Xpert specificity was 99.8 (99.7, 99.9) and PPV was 90.6 (83.3, 95.4) for detection of MTB. For the testing scenario of 7000 specimens with 2.7% of specimens culture positive for MTB, costs were $165,690 for Xpert and $115,360 for the package of microscopy plus culture.In the context of a TB prevalence survey, the Xpert diagnostic yield was substantially higher than that of microscopy yet lower than that of liquid culture. Xpert may be useful as a sole test for TB case detection in prevalence surveys, particularly in settings lacking capacity for liquid culture.Rapid molecular detection of pulmonary tuberculosis in HIV-infected patients in Santiago, Chile.Santiago, Chile, has a mean annual tuberculosis (TB) rate of 13 per 100 000 population; however, TB incidence in human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infected individuals is at least 20 times higher.To assess the accuracy of rapid molecular testing for pulmonary TB (PTB) detection in routine care in HIV-infected patients.Cross-sectional study, conducted prospectively in five hospitals between March 2010 and June 2011. HIV-positive subjects with suspected PTB provided sputum or mouth wash samples that were directly processed for acid-fast smear, mycobacterial cultures and Xpert® MTB/RIF. Positive test results were reported on the same day.We enrolled 166 subjects into the study; 50.6% provided two sputum samples, 33.1% only one sputum sample and 16.3% a mouth wash sample. The prevalence of TB was 8.1% (13/160). Diagnostic sensitivity increased from 66.7% (95%CI 39.1-86.2) for acid-fast smear to 91.7% (95%CI 64.6-98.5) for Xpert MTB/RIF, with comparable specificity at 98.6% (146/148, 95%CI 95.2-99.6) and 99.3% (147/148, 95%CI 96.3-99.9). Xpert MTB/RIF allowed early detection of rifampicin resistance in 16.6% of cases, with rapid adjustment to multidrug-resistant treatment.Xpert MTB/RIF provided earlier TB diagnosis in 25% more cases than acid-fast smear alone. Its implementation should be considered for TB diagnosis in HIV-positive patients even outside TB-endemic areas.Rapid implementation of new TB diagnostic tests: is it too soon for a global roll-out of Xpert MTB/RIF?In 2011 the World Health Organization approved Xpert MTB/RIF for tuberculosis diagnosis and recommended its rapid implementation. Xpert MTB/RIF is accurate: sensitivity is 72.5 -98.2% (smear-negative and -positive cases, respectively) and specificity 99.2%. Benefits include same-day diagnosis and simultaneous detection of rifampicin resistance. However, the test has some shortcomings and has not had time for thorough evaluation. Cost-effectiveness studies are difficult to perform and few have been completed. Existing data suggest cost-effectiveness in some, but not all, settings. The urgent need for better diagnostics is evident. Yet, serial implementation of new technologies causes ineffective spending and fragmentation of services. How new tests are incorporated into existing diagnostic algorithms affects both outcomes and costs. More detailed data on performance, effect on patient-important outcomes, and costs when used with adjunct tests are needed for each setting before implementation. While awaiting further clarification it seems prudent to slow its implementation among resource-constrained tuberculosis control programs.An evaluation of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay and detection of false-positive rifampicin resistance in Mycobacterium tuberculosis.Recent reports suggest that false-positive rifampicin resistance may be assigned by the Xpert MTB/RIF assay. We analysed 169 specimens using the MTB/RIF assay. Using culture as the gold standard, we found that the assay had 100% sensitivity and specificity for detecting M. tuberculosis. However, we found that the assay incorrectly assigned rifampicin resistance in 4/13 (31%) of cases.The diagnostic accuracy of urine-based Xpert MTB/RIF in HIV-infected hospitalized patients who are smear-negative or sputum scarce.Hospitals in sub-Saharan Africa are inundated with HIV-infected patients and tuberculosis (TB) is the commonest opportunistic infection in this sub-group. Up to one third of TB-HIV co-infected patients fail to produce a sputum sample (sputum scarce) and diagnosis is thus often delayed or missed. We investigated the sensitivity of urine-based methods (Xpert MTB/RIF, LAM strip test and LAM ELISA) in such patients.281 HIV-infected hospitalised patients with clinically suspected TB provided a spot urine sample. The reference standard was culture positivity for Mycobacterium tuberculosis on ≥1 sputum or extra-pulmonary sample. MTB/RIF was performed using 1 ml of both unprocessed and, when possible, concentrated urine. Each unconcentrated urine sample was also tested using the Clearview LAM ELISA and Alere LAM strip test. 42% (116/242) of patients had culture-proven TB. 18% (20/54) were sputum scarce. In sputum-scarce patients, the sensitivity of urine MTB/RIF and LAM ELISA was 40% (95%CI: 22-61) and 60% (95%CI: 39-78), respectively. Urine MTB/RIF specificity was 98% (95%CI: 95-100). Combined sensitivity of urine LAM ELISA and MTB/RIF was better than MTB/RIF alone [MTB/RIF and LAM: 70% (95%CI: 48-85) vs. MTB/RIF: 40% (95%CI: 22-61), p = 0.03]. Significant predictors of urine MTB/RIF positivity were CD4<50 cells/ml (p = 0.001), elevated protein-to-creatinine ratio (p<0.001) and LAM ELISA positivity (p<0.001). Urine centrifugation and pelleting significantly increased the sensitivity of MTB/RIF over unprocessed urine in paired samples [42% (95%CI: 26-58) vs. 8% (95%CI: 0-16), p<0.001]. Urine MTB/RIF-generated C(T) values correlated poorly with markers of bacillary burden (smear grade and time-to-positivity).This preliminary study indicates that urine-based MTB/RIF, alone or in combination with LAM antigen detection, may potentially aid the diagnosis of TB in HIV-infected patients with advanced immunosuppression when sputum-based diagnosis is not possible. Concentration of urine prior to MTB/RIF-testing significantly improves sensitivity.Evaluation of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay at a tertiary care referral hospital in a setting where tuberculosis and HIV infection are highly endemic.BACKGROUND. There were 1.45 million deaths from tuberculosis in 2011. A substantial proportion of active pulmonary tuberculosis cases in countries where tuberculosis, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection, and AIDS are highly endemic remain undiagnosed because of the reliance on sputum-smear microscopy. This study evaluated the performance of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay at a tertiary care referral center in Zambia, a country where the burden of tuberculosis and HIV infection is high. METHODS. A total of 881 adult inpatients admitted to University Teaching Hospital in Lusaka who were able to produce sputum were enrolled and analyzed in the study, irrespective of admission diagnosis. Sputum specimens were analyzed by fluorescence smear microscopy, the Xpert MTB/RIF assay, mycobacterial growth indicator tube (MGIT) culture,and MGIT drug-susceptibility testing. The sensitivity and specificity of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay were evaluated using culture as the gold standard. RESULTS. Culture-confirmed tuberculosis was found in 201 of 881 patients (22.8%). The specificity of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay was 95.0% (95% confidence interval [CI], 92.4%–96.8%),and the sensitivity was 86.1% (95% CI, 80.3%–90.4%). In sputum smear–negative, culture-positive cases, the assay was 74.7% sensitive (95% CI, 64.6%–82.8%), identifying 71 additional tuberculosis cases that were not detected by smear microscopy.A total of 18 of 111 patients with tuberculosis who were tested (16.2%) had multidrug-resistant (MDR) tuberculosis.The sensitivity and specificity of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for detecting culture-confirmed, rifampicin-resistant tuberculosis was 81.3% (95% CI, 53.7%–95.0%) and 97.5% (95% CI,90.4%–99.6%), respectively. CONCLUSIONS. The Xpert MTB/RIF assay performs better than smear microscopy in an inpatient setting in a country where tuberculosis and HIV infection are highly endemic. Assessment of its usefulness and cost-effectiveness for increased detection of tuberculosis cases missed by sputum smear and for concomitant screening for MDR tuberculosis among adult inpatients attending tertiary care referral centers in other countries with a high burden of tuberculosis and HIV infection is warranted [corrected].Rapid molecular diagnosis of pulmonary tuberculosis in children using nasopharyngeal specimens.A rapid diagnosis of pediatric pulmonary tuberculosis (PTB) using Xpert MTB/RIF (Mycobacterium tuberculosis/rifampicin) automated testing on induced sputum (IS) is possible, but the capacity for performing IS is limited. The diagnosis using a nasopharyngeal aspirate (NPA), which can be non-invasively obtained, is desirable.Paired specimens (NPA and IS) were tested using smear, liquid culture and Xpert. The diagnostic accuracy of Xpert and smear was compared with culture for different specimens in children with suspected PTB.There were 535 children [median age 19 months, 117 (21·9%) HIV-infected] who had one IS and one NPA specimen; 396 had two paired specimens. A positive smear, Xpert test or culture occurred in 30 (5.6%), 81 (15.1%) and 87 children (16.3%), respectively. The culture yield was higher from IS (84/87, 96.6%) vs NPA (61/87, 70.1%, P < .001). Amongst children with two paired specimens, 63 culture-confirmed cases occurred [60 (95.2%) IS vs 48 (76.2%) NPA, P = .002]. The sensitivity of two Xpert tests was similar for IS and NPAs [(45/63) 71% vs (41/63) 65%, P = .444)]; the sensitivity of smear was lower for IS (21/63, 33%) and NPA (16/63, 25%). The incremental yield from a second IS was 9 cases (17.6%) by culture and 9 (25%) by Xpert testing; a second NPA increased the culture yield by 10 (26.3%) and Xpert by 11 (36.7%). Xpert specificity was 99.1% (98.1-100) for IS and 98.2% (96.8-99.6) for NPAs. Xpert testing provided faster results than culture (median 0 vs 15 days, P < .001).Xpert testing on 2 NPAs is useful in children with suspected PTB, particularly in settings where IS and culture are not feasible.Delay in commencing treatment for MDR TB at a specialised TB treatment centre in KwaZulu-Natal.Background. According to the National Department of Health (NDoH) guidelines, patients diagnosed with MDR TB must be referred to a specialised treatment centre for initiation of effective therapy. MDR TB is difficult to diagnose and the centralised referral model is beset with challenges that contribute to treatment delays, increased patient morbidity and mortality, and MDR TB nosocomial transmission. Culture and DST takes 8 weeks or longer to obtain results while line probe assays (LPAs) can give a result in hours. LPAs and the GeneXpert MTB/Rif (GX) are ground-breaking discoveries for TB diagnosis. However, they are not easily accessible or available to those needing it, so culture and sensitivity testing remains the gold standard for diagnosis. Aim. This study aimed to assess the delay in the initiation of MDR TB treatment and profiled the patients being referred to a specialised drug-resistant treatment centre in KwaZulu-Natal. Results. Of all the patients, 75% referred showed a mean delay of 12.4 weeks from the date of sputum collection for culture and drug sensitivity testing to the start of treatment. Most of the patients were symptomatic for TB and HIV-positive. Discussion. Our findings suggest that current policy on the initiation of effective treatment needs urgent revision. Staff should be appropriately trained in LPA and GX technology to reduce delays in initiating treatment for MDR TB. The NDoH's plans for rapid diagnosis and reducing the treatment burden on centralised MDR TB management facilities are in the early phases of implementation and will take years to achieve favourable and significant outcomes. Conclusion. There is a significant delay in initiating definitive management for MDR TB.Correlation of mycobacterium tuberculosis specific and non-specific quantitative Th1 T-cell responses with bacillary load in a high burden setting.Measures of bacillary load in patients with tuberculosis (TB) may be useful for predicting and monitoring response to treatment. The relationship between quantitative T-cell responses and mycobacterial load remains unclear. We hypothesised that, in a HIV-prevalent high burden setting, the magnitude of mycobacterial antigen-specific and non-specific T-cell IFN-γ responses would correlate with (a) bacterial load and (b) culture conversion in patients undergoing treatment.We compared baseline (n = 147), 2 (n = 35) and 6 month (n = 13) purified-protein-derivative (PPD) and RD1-specific (TSPOT.TB and QFT-GIT) blood RD1-specific (TSPOT.TB; QFT-GIT) responses with associates of sputum bacillary load in patients with culture-confirmed TB in Cape Town, South Africa.IFN-γ responses were not associated with liquid culture time-to-positivity, smear-grade, Xpert MTB/RIF-generated cycle threshold values or the presence of cavities on the chest radiograph in patients with culture-confirmed TB and irrespective of HIV-status. 2-month IGRA conversion rates (positive-to-negative) were negligible [<11% for TSPOT.TB (3/28) and QFT-GIT (1/29)] and lower compared to culture [60% (21/35); p<0.01].In a high burden HIV-prevalent setting T-cell IFN-γ responses to M. tuberculosis-specific and non-specific antigens do not correlate with bacillary load, including Xpert MTB/RIF-generated C(T) values, and are therefore poorly suited for monitoring treatment and prognostication.Antigen detection as a point-of-care test for TB: the case of lipoarabinomannan.The limitations of sputum smear microscopy, routine chest radiology for HIV-associated TB and culture-based diagnosis are well recognized, especially in resource-limited settings. The diagnostic accuracy of a new point-of-care lateral-flow urine strip test for lipoarabinomannan (Determine(®) TB-LAM; Alere, MA, USA), which costs US$3.50 per test strip and provides results within 30 min, was evaluated in a cohort of South African patients for HIV-associated TB before starting anti-retroviral therapy in South Africa. Prevalence of culture-positive TB cases was 17.4%, among which 28.2% had sputum smear positivity. Determine(®) TB-LAM (Alere, MA, USA) had highest sensitivity at low CD4 cell counts: 66.7, 51.7 and 39.0% at <50 cells, <100 cells and <200 cells per µl, respectively; specificity was greater than 98% for all strata. There was an incremental sensitivity when Determine TB-LAM was combined with smear microscopy, which did not differ statistically from the sensitivities obtained by testing a single sputum sample with the Xpert(®) MTB/RIF (Cepheid; CA, USA) assay. Determine TB-LAM is a simple, low-cost alternative to existing diagnostic assays for TB screening in HIV-infected patients with very low CD4(+) cell counts.Clinical significance of lipoarabinomannan detection in urine using a low-cost point-of-care diagnostic assay for HIV-associated tuberculosis.A low-cost point-of-care urine assay for lipoarabinomannan (LAM) used for screening patients prior to antiretroviral therapy (ART) rapidly diagnoses a proportion of tuberculosis (TB) cases. We determined the characteristics and outcomes of such patients.Adults enrolling in a South African township ART clinic were systematically screened for pulmonary TB by testing paired sputum samples using microscopy, liquid culture and Xpert MTB/RIF in a centralized laboratory. Stored urine samples were retrospectively tested for LAM using the Determine TB-LAM assay, but results did not inform treatment. Patients were followed up in the routine ART service and early (90-day) programmatic outcomes were determined. Analysis was restricted to those with CD4 cell counts below 200 cells/μl.Of patients with CD4 cell counts below 200 cells/μl and complete results (n=325), 59 (18.2%) had culture-positive TB. Of these, 23 (39%) patients tested urine LAM-positive and 36 (61%) urine LAM-negative. Patients with LAM-positive TB had much lower CD4 cell counts, higher plasma viral loads, lower haemoglobin concentrations and lower BMIs compared to those with LAM-negative TB. They also had evidence of higher mycobacterial load, more frequently testing sputum smear-positive, Xpert-positive (sputum and urine) and having a shorter time to sputum culture positivity. Of five (8.5%) patients who died, four did so before TB treatment was started. All five retrospectively tested LAM-positive.A low-cost point-of-care urine test for LAM rapidly diagnoses a sub-group of cases with advanced HIV-associated TB and poor prognosis. If used in combination with laboratory-based diagnostics, treatment delays would decrease and survival might be improved.Can a simple flotation method lower the limit of detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in extrapulmonary samples analyzed by the GeneXpert MTB/RIF assay?The rapid and accurate diagnosis of tuberculosis (TB) in children and extrapulmonary TB in adults continues to be a challenge. In this study, we determined the lower limit of detection (LOD) of the GeneXpert MTB/RIF assay with nonrespiratory specimens and investigated the utility of flotation procedures for concentrating the bacilli. Clinical specimens (9 cerebrospinal fluid [CSF], 13 gastric aspirate, 8 tissue, and 17 stool) were spiked with single-celled Mycobacterium tuberculosis, and the LOD of the GeneXpert assay was determined. Flotation studies were conducted with sucrose and NaCl, and the cycle thresholds of the MTB/RIF assay were compared between treated and untreated samples. There was no significant difference between the LODs of the GeneXpert assay with saline solution (median, 33 CFU/ml) and CSF (median, 25 CFU/ml) (P > 0.05) or gastric aspirate samples (median, 58 CFU/ml) (P > 0.05). The LOD with spiked tissue (median, 1,525 CFU/ml) and stool samples (median, 6,800 CFU/ml) was significantly elevated compared to that determined with saline solution (P ≤ 0.05 and ≤ 0.0005, respectively). Flotation studies with sucrose or NaCl did not consistently result in lowered cycle thresholds in stool or gastric aspirates, but a cycle reduction of >10 was achieved in two of the three pooled CSF samples. Unlike the results seen with tissue and stool samples, there was no significant PCR inhibition in the MTB/RIF assay with CSF and gastric aspirates. Although preconcentration of CSF samples with sucrose and NaCl may enhance detection of M. tuberculosis by PCR, further advances are needed to concentrate the bacilli and eliminate PCR inhibitors in paucibacillary nonrespiratory samples.Increased and expedited case detection by Xpert MTB/RIF assay in childhood tuberculosis: a prospective cohort study.Diagnosis and timely treatment of tuberculosis in children is hampered by the absence of fast and reliable tests, especially in the era of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic performance of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay (Xpert) in children with suspected tuberculosis in a high tuberculosis/HIV-burden setting.In a prospective study with a minimum follow-up of 12 months, 164 children with suspected tuberculosis were assigned to predefined diagnostic subgroups, based on microbiological and clinical findings. Results of smear microscopy and culture were compared against diagnostic performance of Xpert.Twenty-eight of 164 children (17.1%) had confirmed tuberculosis. Xpert detected 100% (95% confidence interval [CI], 59.0%-100%) of smear-positive cases and 66.6% (95% CI, 43.0%-85.4%) of culture-positive but smear-negative cases. In the per-sample analysis, Xpert displayed a similar sensitivity (54.7% [95% CI, 42.7%-66.2%]) compared with culture methods. Xpert detected 3-fold more confirmed tuberculosis cases than smear microscopy but with equal rapidity. Four additional cases (8.5%) with clinical tuberculosis but negative culture were diagnosed by Xpert. Testing second and third samples increased sensitivity by 20% and an additional 16%, respectively. When tuberculosis was reliably excluded, Xpert's specificity was 100%. HIV infection did not affect diagnostic accuracy of Xpert.Xpert was easy to perform and displayed similar diagnostic accuracy as culture methods in children with suspected tuberculosis. Rapid turnaround times should reduce treatment delay and improve patient outcome, although sensitivity remains suboptimal and access is dependent on local laboratory infrastructure.Characteristics and early outcomes of patients with Xpert MTB/RIF-negative pulmonary tuberculosis diagnosed during screening before antiretroviral therapy.A proportion of patients with tuberculosis diagnosed by sputum culture during screening before antiretroviral therapy (ART) have false-negative Xpert MTB/RIF assay results (Xpert-negative tuberculosis). We determined the characteristics and early ART program outcomes of such patients.Adult patients who enrolled in a South African township ART service were systematically screened for pulmonary tuberculosis regardless of symptoms by testing paired sputum samples with Xpert MTB/RIF and liquid culture. The ART service provided follow-up for all patients, and early (90-day) programmatic outcomes were determined.Among 602 patients screened, 523 had ≥1 Xpert and culture result, yielding 89 culture-positive tuberculosis diagnoses. Of these, 37 (42%) of the patients with tuberculosis were Xpert-negative when a single sputum sample was tested, compared with 25 (28%) when 2 samples were tested. Compared with patients with Xpert-positive tuberculosis, those with Xpert-negative tuberculosis (using either definition) had substantially higher CD4 cell counts, lower plasma viral loads, higher hemoglobin concentrations, and higher body mass index. Their tuberculosis was also less advanced, with a lower frequency of prolonged cough (≥2 weeks), less extensive radiographic abnormalities, and a lower frequency of detectable lipoarabinomannan antigenuria and mycobacteriuria. Xpert-negative cases were all sputum smear negative with prolonged time to culture positivity (median, 21 days). Despite greater delays in starting tuberculosis treatment, Xpert-negative patients were less likely to die during follow-up.Compared to patients with Xpert-positive tuberculosis diagnosed during pre-ART screening, Xpert-negative cases had less advanced immunosuppression and less advanced tuberculosis and did not have adverse outcomes despite substantial delays in starting tuberculosis treatment.Clinical validation of Xpert MTB/RIF for the diagnosis of extrapulmonary tuberculosis.Extrapulmonary tuberculosis (EPTB) accounts for more than 20% of tuberculosis (TB) cases. Xpert MTB/RIF (Xpert) (Cepheid, Sunnyvale, CA, USA) is a fully automated amplification system, for which excellent results in the diagnosis of pulmonary TB in highly endemic countries have been recently reported. We aimed to assess the performance of the Xpert system in diagnosing EPTB in a low incidence setting. We investigated with Xpert a large number of consecutive extrapulmonary clinical specimens (1,476, corresponding to 1,068 patients) including both paediatric (494) and adult samples. We found, in comparison with a reference standard consisting of combination of culture and clinical diagnosis of TB, an overall sensitivity and specificity of 81.3% and 99.8% for Xpert, while the sensitivity of microscopy was 48%. For biopsies, urines, pus and cerebrospinal fluids the sensitivity exceeded 85%, while it was slightly under 80% for gastric aspirates. It was, in contrast, lower than 50% for cavitary fluids. High sensitivity and specificity (86.9% and 99.7%, respectively) were also obtained for paediatric specimens. Although the role of culture remains central in the microbiological diagnosis of EPTB, the sensitivity of Xpert in rapidly diagnosing the disease makes it a much better choice compared to smear microscopy. The ability to rule out the disease still remains suboptimal.Effectiveness of an integrated real-time PCR method for detection of the Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex in smear-negative extrapulmonary samples in an area of low tuberculosis prevalence.Early extrapulmonary tuberculosis (EPTB) diagnosis is particularly difficult. Among 108 smear-negative extrapulmonary samples showing a positive culture for Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex (43 body fluids and 65 nonliquid specimens), 63 (58.3%) were positive with the Xpert MTB/RIF assay (GX). GX sensitivity was quite low for samples from sterile locations (especially for pleural fluids: 26.9%) but high for some nonliquid samples, like abscess aspirates (76.5%). In summary, GX may be a useful tool to be considered for EPTB diagnosis.The use of an automated quantitative polymerase chain reaction (Xpert MTB/RIF) to predict the sputum smear status of tuberculosis patients.Xpert MTB/RIF-generated cycle-threshold (C(T)) values have poor clinical utility as a rule-in test for smear positivity (cut-point ≤20.2; sensitivity 32.3%, specificity 97.1%) but moderately good rule-out value (cut-point >31.8; negative predictive value 80.0%). Thus, 20% of individuals with C(T) values >31.8 were erroneously ruled out as smear-negative. This group had a significantly lower sputum bacillary load relative to correctly classified smear-positive patients (C(T) ≤ 31.8; P < .001). These data inform on public health and contact tracing strategies.Clinical failures associated with rpoB mutations in phenotypically occult multidrug-resistant Mycobacterium tuberculosis.Recently, Mycobacterium tuberculosis isolates have been described that test phenotypically susceptible to rifampicin (RMP) yet harbour genotypic rpoB mutations.1) To investigate the impact of such mutations on clinical outcomes among RMP-susceptible isolates, and 2) to determine the prevalence of rpoB mutations among isoniazid (INH) monoresistant isolates at our laboratory and to describe the association between the presence of these mutations and clinical outcomes.M. tuberculosis isolates were screened for mutations in the rpoB gene using the Cepheid Gene-Xpert® MTB/RIF assay. Clinical correlation was made by reviewing patient case notes.Isolates from 94 patients were found to have INH-resistant, RMP-susceptible profiles. Clinical information was available for 52 patients, including three whose isolates had rpoB mutations. All three of these patients had treatment failures, compared to two of 49 patients whose isolates did not have rpoB mutations (P = 0.0005).We demonstrate a significant association between the presence of rpoB gene mutations that are not detected at the current RMP critical concentration and treatment failure. We suggest that a review of the current RMP critical concentration is warranted to ensure that RMP is not used inappropriately for the treatment of phenotypically occult multidrug-resistant tuberculosis.Do adjunct tuberculosis tests, when combined with Xpert MTB/RIF, improve accuracy and the cost of diagnosis in a resource-poor setting?Information regarding the utility of adjunct diagnostic tests in combination with Xpert MTB/RIF (Cepheid, Sunnyvale, CA, USA) is limited. We hypothesised adjunct tests could enhance accuracy and/or reduce the cost of tuberculosis (TB) diagnosis prior to MTB/RIF testing, and rule-in or rule-out TB in MTB/RIF-negative individuals. We assessed the accuracy and/or laboratory-associated cost of diagnosis of smear microscopy, chest radiography (CXR) and interferon-γ release assays (IGRAs; T-SPOT-TB (Oxford Immunotec, Oxford, UK) and QuantiFERON-TB Gold In-Tube (Cellestis, Chadstone, Australia)) combined with MTB/RIF for TB in 480 patients in South Africa. When conducted prior to MTB/RIF: 1) smear microscopy followed by MTB/RIF (if smear negative) had the lowest cost of diagnosis of any strategy investigated; 2) a combination of smear microscopy, CXR (if smear negative) and MTB/RIF (if imaging compatible with active TB) did not further reduce the cost per TB case diagnosed; and 3) a normal CXR ruled out TB in 18% of patients (57 out of 324; negative predictive value (NPV) 100%). When downstream adjunct tests were applied to MTB/RIF-negative individuals, radiology ruled out TB in 24% (56 out of 234; NPV 100%), smear microscopy ruled in TB in 21% (seven out of 24) of culture-positive individuals and IGRAs were not useful in either context. In resource-poor settings, smear microscopy combined with MTB/RIF had the highest accuracy and lowest cost of diagnosis compared to either technique alone. In MTB/RIF-negative individuals, CXR has poor rule-in value but can reliably rule out TB in approximately one in four cases. These data inform upon the programmatic utility of MTB/RIF in high-burden settings.Xpert® MTB/RIF assay: development, evaluation and implementation of a new rapid molecular diagnostic for tuberculosis and rifampicin resistance.Global TB control efforts have been severely hampered by the lack of diagnostic tests that are accurate, simple to use and can be applied at the point of clinical care. This has been further compounded by the widespread inability to test for drug resistance. The Xpert(®) MTB/RIF assay is a rapid molecular assay that can be used close to the point of care by operators with minimal technical expertise, enabling diagnosis of TB and simultaneous assessment of rifampicin resistance to be completed within 2 h. Moreover, this can be accomplished using unprocessed sputum samples as well as clinical specimens from extrapulmonary sites. We review in detail the development of this assay, its evaluation within the laboratory, its utility among adult and pediatric TB suspects, its use as a screening tool for HIV-associated TB and studies of its implementation at the district and sub-district levels in resource-limited settings. Following endorsement by the WHO in 2010, we consider the next steps in the implementation of the assay and its potential impact in high burden settings.GeneXpert® MTB/RIF for rapid detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in pulmonary and extra-pulmonary samples.Detecting drug-resistant tuberculosis: the importance of rapid testing.Despite numerous intervention strategies, including the direct observed short-course treatment strategy and improved diagnostic methods, the incidence of multidrug-resistant and extensively drug-resistant tuberculosis (TB) continues to rise globally. Many treatment policies are based on the model that acquisition of drug resistance in already infected individuals drives the drug-resistant TB epidemic, hence the focus on drug-resistance testing of retreatment cases. However, molecular epidemiology and mathematical modeling suggest that the majority of multidrug-resistant TB cases are due to ongoing transmission of multidrug-resistant strains. This is most likely the result of diagnostic delay, thereby emphasizing the need for rapid diagnostics and comprehensive contact tracing, as well as active case finding. Current diagnosis of TB in low-income, high-burden regions relies on smear microscopy and clinical signs and symptoms. However, this smear-centered approach has many pitfalls, including low sensitivity in HIV patients and children, the inability of smear to reveal drug-resistance patterns, and the need for sampling on consecutive days. In order to address these limitations, efforts have been made to expand access to Mycobacterium tuberculosis culture and drug susceptibility testing. However, the slow growth rate of the causative agent, M. tuberculosis, contributes to significant diagnostic delay. Molecular-based diagnostic methods, targeting mutations that are known to confirm drug resistance, are capable of significantly reducing diagnostic delay. Two such methods, the line-probe assay and the real-time PCR-based Xpert® MTB/RIF assay, have been described. The latter test shows particular promise for smear-negative and extrapulmonary specimens. This may prove especially useful in settings where co-infection rates with HIV are high. However, since most research focuses on the performance of both of these assays, further investigations need to be done regarding the impact of the routine implementation of these assays on TB control programs and the cost effectiveness thereof.Comparison of two nucleic acid amplification assays, the Xpert MTB/RIF assay and the amplified Mycobacterium Tuberculosis Direct assay, for detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in respiratory and nonrespiratory specimens.We compared the performance of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay, a new real-time tuberculosis (TB) PCR test, with that of the Amplified Mycobacterium Tuberculosis Direct (MTD) assay using 162 respiratory and nonrespiratory specimens. Based on culture as the gold standard, the overall sensitivity and specificity for all sample types for the Xpert MTB/RIF assay were 90.9 and 89%, respectively, while for the MTD assay, the overall sensitivity and specificity were 97.3 and 87.1%, respectively. A higher proportion of total equivocal results were obtained for the MTD assay, at 10.5% (17/162), while the Xpert MTB/RIF assay generated 5.5% (9/162) of invalid reads.Performance of Xpert MTB/RIF RUO assay and IS6110 real-time PCR for Mycobacterium tuberculosis detection in clinical samples.The Cepheid Xpert MTB/RIF research-use-only (RUO) assay and a laboratory-developed test (LDT) targeting IS6110 were evaluated and compared to mycobacterial culture as the gold standard. The performance characteristics of both molecular assays were determined by using 112 specimens from 90 patients, including 89 pulmonary specimens and 23 extrapulmonary specimens. Of the specimens tested, 37 (33%) were culture positive for the Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex; 29 were pulmonary, and 8 were extrapulmonary. Of these culture-positive specimens, 83% of the pulmonary specimens and 50% of the extrapulmonary specimens were smear positive. There was complete concordance between the smear-positive culture-positive specimens, independent of the anatomical site (100% sensitivity). The sensitivity of the MTB/RIF RUO assay for smear-negative specimens was 60% for pulmonary and 75% for extrapulmonary specimens, while the IS6110 LDT sensitivities were 40% and 0%, respectively. There was also complete concordance among the culture-negative specimens tested. Both assays showed 95% specificity, with four culture-negative specimens testing as positive. A review of patient records indicated that there was a high likelihood of the presence of M. tuberculosis complex DNA in the false-positive specimens. Biosafety analysis was performed and showed an acceptable reduction in organism viability using the processing methods described above. Both molecular assays are suitable for the detection of M. tuberculosis isolates in smear-positive pulmonary and extrapulmonary specimens, while the sensitivity of the detection of M. tuberculosis isolates in smear-negative specimens was variable.A multisite assessment of the quantitative capabilities of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay.The Xpert MTB/RIF is an automated molecular test for Mycobacterium tuberculosis that estimates bacterial burden by measuring the threshold-cycle (Ct) of its M. tuberculosis-specific real-time polymerase chain reaction. Bacterial burden is an important biomarker for disease severity, infection control risk, and response to therapy.Evaluate bacterial load quantitation by Xpert MTB/RIF compared with conventional quantitative methods.Xpert MTB/RIF results were compared with smear-microscopy, semiquantiative solid culture, and time-to-detection in liquid culture for 741 patients and 2,008 samples tested in a multisite clinical trial. An internal control real-time polymerase chain reaction was evaluated for its ability to identify inaccurate quantitative Xpert MTB/RIF results.Assays with an internal control Ct greater than 34 were likely to be inaccurately quantitated; this represented 15% of M. tuberculosis-positive tests. Excluding these, decreasing M. tuberculosis Ct was associated with increasing smear microscopy grade for smears of concentrated sputum pellets (r(s) = -0.77) and directly from sputum (r(s) =-0.71). A Ct cutoff of approximately 27.7 best predicted smear-positive status. The association between M. tuberculosis Ct and time-to-detection in liquid culture (r(s) = 0.68) and semiquantitative colony counts (r(s) = -0.56) was weaker than smear. Tests of paired same-patient sputum showed that high viscosity sputum samples contained ×32 more M. tuberculosis than nonviscous samples. Comparisons between the grade of the acid-fast bacilli smear and Xpert MTB/RIF quantitative data across study sites enabled us to identify a site outlier in microscopy.Xpert MTB/RIF quantitation offers a new, standardized approach to measuring bacterial burden in the sputum of patients with tuberculosis.Xpert MTB/RIF test for tuberculosis.Xpert MTB/RIF test for tuberculosis.Xpert MTB/RIF test for tuberculosis.Screening for HIV-associated tuberculosis and rifampicin resistance before antiretroviral therapy using the Xpert MTB/RIF assay: a prospective study.The World Health Organization has endorsed the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for investigation of patients suspected of having tuberculosis (TB). However, its utility for routine TB screening and detection of rifampicin resistance among HIV-infected patients with advanced immunodeficiency enrolling in antiretroviral therapy (ART) services is unknown.Consecutive adult HIV-infected patients with no current TB diagnosis enrolling in an ART clinic in a South African township were recruited regardless of symptoms. They were clinically characterised and invited to provide two sputum samples at a single visit. The accuracy of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for diagnosing TB and drug resistance was assessed in comparison with other tests, including fluorescence smear microscopy and automated liquid culture (gold standard) and drug susceptibility testing. Of 515 patients enrolled, 468 patients (median CD4 cell count, 171 cells/µl; interquartile range, 102-236) produced at least one sputum sample, yielding complete sets of results from 839 samples. Mycobacterium tuberculosis was cultured from 81 patients (TB prevalence, 17.3%). The overall sensitivity of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for culture-positive TB was 73.3% (specificity, 99.2%) compared to 28.0% (specificity, 100%) using smear microscopy. All smear-positive, culture-positive disease was detected by Xpert MTB/RIF from a single sample (sensitivity, 100%), whereas the sensitivity for smear-negative, culture-positive TB was 43.4% from one sputum sample and 62.3% from two samples. Xpert correctly identified rifampicin resistance in all four cases of multidrug-resistant TB but incorrectly identified resistance in three other patients whose disease was confirmed to be drug sensitive by gene sequencing (specificity, 94.1%; positive predictive value, 57%).In this population of individuals at high risk of TB, intensive screening using the Xpert MTB/RIF assay increased case detection by 45% compared with smear microscopy, strongly supporting replacement of microscopy for this indication. However, despite the ability of the assay to rapidly detect rifampicin-resistant disease, the specificity for drug-resistant TB was sub-optimal.GeneXpert--a game-changer for tuberculosis control?Is scale-up worth it? Challenges in economic analysis of diagnostic tests for tuberculosis.David Dowdy and colleagues discuss the complexities of costing new TB diagnostic tests, including GeneXpert, and argue that flexible analytic tools are needed for decision-makers to adapt large-sample cost-effectiveness data to local conditions.Comparison of Xpert MTB/RIF with other nucleic acid technologies for diagnosing pulmonary tuberculosis in a high HIV prevalence setting: a prospective study.The Xpert MTB/RIF (Cepheid) non-laboratory-based molecular assay has potential to improve the diagnosis of tuberculosis (TB), especially in HIV-infected populations, through increased sensitivity, reduced turnaround time (2 h), and immediate identification of rifampicin (RIF) resistance. In a prospective clinical validation study we compared the performance of Xpert MTB/RIF, MTBDRplus (Hain Lifescience), LightCycler Mycobacterium Detection (LCTB) (Roche), with acid fast bacilli (AFB) smear microscopy and liquid culture on a single sputum specimen.Consecutive adults with suspected TB attending a primary health care clinic in Johannesburg, South Africa, were prospectively enrolled and evaluated for TB according to the guidelines of the National TB Control Programme, including assessment for smear-negative TB by chest X-ray, clinical evaluation, and HIV testing. A single sputum sample underwent routine decontamination, AFB smear microscopy, liquid culture, and phenotypic drug susceptibility testing. Residual sample was batched for molecular testing. For the 311 participants, the HIV prevalence was 70% (n = 215), with 120 (38.5%) culture-positive TB cases. Compared to liquid culture, the sensitivities of all the test methodologies, determined with a limited and potentially underpowered sample size (n = 177), were 59% (47%-71%) for smear microscopy, 76% (64%-85%) for MTBDRplus, 76% (64%-85%) for LCTB, and 86% (76%-93%) for Xpert MTB/RIF, with specificities all >97%. Among HIV+ individuals, the sensitivity of the Xpert MTB/RIF test was 84% (69%-93%), while the other molecular tests had sensitivities reduced by 6%. TB detection among smear-negative, culture-positive samples was 28% (5/18) for MTBDRplus, 22% (4/18) for LCTB, and 61% (11/18) for Xpert MTB/RIF. A few (n = 5) RIF-resistant cases were detected using the phenotypic drug susceptibility testing methodology. Xpert MTB/RIF detected four of these five cases (fifth case not tested) and two additional phenotypically sensitive cases.The Xpert MTB/RIF test has superior performance for rapid diagnosis of Mycobacterium tuberculosis over existing AFB smear microscopy and other molecular methodologies in an HIV- and TB-endemic region. Its place in the clinical diagnostic algorithm in national health programs needs exploration. Please see later in the article for the Editors' Summary.Xpert MTB/RIF®, a novel automated polymerase chain reaction-based tool for the diagnosis of tuberculosis.There is an urgent need for new point of care tests for tuberculosis (TB). Xpert MTB/RIF® is a real-time polymerase chain reaction-based system that detects Mycobacterium tuberculosis DNA and rifampicin (RMP) resistance modulating mutations directly from clinical samples in 2 h. The sensitivity for detecting M. tuberculosis in culture-positive samples was 93.8% (60/64) and exceeded smear microscopy (40/64, 62.5%). The specificity for detecting M. tuberculosis was 92.0% (23/25) and for RMP resistance it was 100% (8/8). The test is simple to conduct and requires basic sputum handling facilities only. These characteristics render it a promising close-to-patient test for TB in various settings.Cepheid GeneXpert MTB/RIF assay for Mycobacterium tuberculosis detection and rifampin resistance identification in patients with substantial clinical indications of tuberculosis and smear-negative microscopy results.The GeneXpert MTB/RIF assay was evaluated with microscopically negative and positive pulmonary and extrapulmonary specimens from patients with substantial clinical indications for tuberculosis. For the pulmonary samples, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were 90.6%, 94.3%, 93.5%, and 91.7%, and for the extrapulmonary samples, they were 100%, 91.6%, 50%, and 100%, respectively. For microscopically negative specimens, the respective values were 86.3%, 93%, 79%, and 95.6%. The assay correctly detected rifampin resistance in all but one specimen, which harbored a mixed population. The GeneXpert assay was highly effective for tuberculosis diagnosis and identification of rifampin-resistant strains in smear-negative samples.Comparison of two molecular methods for rapid diagnosis of extrapulmonary tuberculosis.Application of real-time PCR for the detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis enables results to be obtained in about 2 h. A total of 340 nonrespiratory samples were processed using two real-time PCR assay kits: Xpert MTB/RIF and Cobas TaqMan MTB. The sensitivity and specificity of the Xpert assay were 95% and 100%, respectively, compared to 78% and 98% for the Cobas assay.Xpert MTB/RIF: a new pillar in diagnosis of extrapulmonary tuberculosis?Approximately 10 to 15% of tuberculosis (TB) cases in India are estimated to have extrapulmonary disease, and due to a lack of diagnostic means, they often remain untreated. The early detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis and multidrug resistance is a priority in TB diagnosis to improve the successful treatment rate of TB and reduce transmission. The Xpert MTB/RIF (Xpert) test, recently endorsed by the World Health Organization for the detection of pulmonary TB, was evaluated to test its utility in 547 patients with suspected extrapulmonary tuberculosis. Five hundred forty-seven extrapulmonary specimens were split and processed simultaneously for both culture (solid and liquid) and Xpert testing. For culture, the sensitivity was low, 53% (150/283 specimens). Xpert sensitivity and specificity results were assessed in comparison to a composite reference standard made up of smear and culture results and clinical, radiological, and histological findings. The sensitivity of the Xpert assay was 81% (228/283 specimens) (64% [89/138] for smear-negative cases and 96% [139/145] for smear-positive cases), with a specificity of 99.6%. The sensitivity was found to be high for the majority of specimen types (63 to 100%) except for cerebrospinal fluid, the sensitivity of which was 29% (2/7 specimens). The Xpert test correctly identified 98% of phenotypic rifampin (RIF)-resistant cases and 94% of phenotypic RIF-susceptible cases. Sequencing of the 6 discrepant samples resolved 3 of them, resulting in an increased specificity of 98%. In conclusion, the results of this study suggest that the Xpert test also shows good potential for the diagnosis of extrapulmonary TB and that its ease of use makes it applicable for countries where TB is endemic.Feasibility, diagnostic accuracy, and effectiveness of decentralised use of the Xpert MTB/RIF test for diagnosis of tuberculosis and multidrug resistance: a multicentre implementation study.The Xpert MTB/RIF test (Cepheid, Sunnyvale, CA, USA) can detect tuberculosis and its multidrug-resistant form with very high sensitivity and specificity in controlled studies, but no performance data exist from district and subdistrict health facilities in tuberculosis-endemic countries. We aimed to assess operational feasibility, accuracy, and effectiveness of implementation in such settings.We assessed adults (≥18 years) with suspected tuberculosis or multidrug-resistant tuberculosis consecutively presenting with cough lasting at least 2 weeks to urban health centres in South Africa, Peru, and India, drug-resistance screening facilities in Azerbaijan and the Philippines, and an emergency room in Uganda. Patients were excluded from the main analyses if their second sputum sample was collected more than 1 week after the first sample, or if no valid reference standard or MTB/RIF test was available. We compared one-off direct MTB/RIF testing in nine microscopy laboratories adjacent to study sites with 2-3 sputum smears and 1-3 cultures, dependent on site, and drug-susceptibility testing. We assessed indicators of robustness including indeterminate rate and between-site performance, and compared time to detection, reporting, and treatment, and patient dropouts for the techniques used.We enrolled 6648 participants between Aug 11, 2009, and June 26, 2010. One-off MTB/RIF testing detected 933 (90·3%) of 1033 culture-confirmed cases of tuberculosis, compared with 699 (67·1%) of 1041 for microscopy. MTB/RIF test sensitivity was 76·9% in smear-negative, culture-positive patients (296 of 385 samples), and 99·0% specific (2846 of 2876 non-tuberculosis samples). MTB/RIF test sensitivity for rifampicin resistance was 94·4% (236 of 250) and specificity was 98·3% (796 of 810). Unlike microscopy, MTB/RIF test sensitivity was not significantly lower in patients with HIV co-infection. Median time to detection of tuberculosis for the MTB/RIF test was 0 days (IQR 0-1), compared with 1 day (0-1) for microscopy, 30 days (23-43) for solid culture, and 16 days (13-21) for liquid culture. Median time to detection of resistance was 20 days (10-26) for line-probe assay and 106 days (30-124) for conventional drug-susceptibility testing. Use of the MTB/RIF test reduced median time to treatment for smear-negative tuberculosis from 56 days (39-81) to 5 days (2-8). The indeterminate rate of MTB/RIF testing was 2·4% (126 of 5321 samples) compared with 4·6% (441 of 9690) for cultures.The MTB/RIF test can effectively be used in low-resource settings to simplify patients' access to early and accurate diagnosis, thereby potentially decreasing morbidity associated with diagnostic delay, dropout and mistreatment.Foundation for Innovative New Diagnostics, Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation, European and Developing Countries Clinical Trials Partnership (TA2007.40200.009), Wellcome Trust (085251/B/08/Z), and UK Department for International Development.Tuberculosis assays: past, present and future.Recent developments in the field of TB diagnostics, including the introduction of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay in field testing, raise the hope for faster and more accurate identification of active TB patients. However, there are still many issues that need to be addressed as no point-of-care tests are yet available. Furthermore, no tests are available which are universally applicable to all patients. Improvements in the microbiological and molecular-based approaches are promising and the diagnostic pipeline is encouraging. Host markers associated with active disease may hold promise, especially in situations where sputum diagnostics are problematic, including in children, HIV-infected individuals and in the case of extrapulmonary TB.Evaluation of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for the diagnosis of pulmonary tuberculosis in a high HIV prevalence setting.Xpert MTB/RIF is a novel automated molecular diagnostic recently endorsed by the World Health Organization. However, performance-related data from high HIV prevalence settings are limited.The impact of sample-related factors on performance and the significance of Xpert MTB/RIF-positive culture-negative discordance remain unclear.Xpert MTB/RIF was evaluated using single archived spot-sputum samples from 496 South African patients with suspected TB. Mycobacterium tuberculosis culture positivity and phenotypic resistance to rifampicin served as reference standards.Overall, Xpert MTB/RIF detected 95% (95% confidence interval [CI], 88-98%; 89 of 94) of smear-positive culture-positive cases and the specificity was 94% (91-96%; 320 of 339). The sensitivity in smear-negative cases was 55% (35-73%; 12 of 22) when the analysis was restricted to 1 ml of unprocessed sputum and culture time-to-positivity of less than or equal to 28 days. Compared with smear microscopy (n=94), Xpert MTB/RIF detected an additional 17 cases (n=111) representing an 18% (11-27%; 111 vs. 94) relative increase in the rapid TB case detection rate. Moreover, compared with smear microscopy, the inclusion of Xpert MTB/RIF-positive culture-negative TB cases (ruled-in by an alternative diagnostic method) resulted in the detection of a further 16 cases (n=127), thus significantly increasing the rapid TB case detection rate to 35% (95% CI, 26-45%; 94 to 111 vs. 94 to 127; P<0.01), the overall specificity to 99.1% (97-100%; 320 of 323; P<0.001), and sensitivity in smear-negative TB to 60% (P=0.12). Performance strongly correlated with smear status and culture time-to-positivity. In patients infected with HIV compared with patients uninfected with HIV Xpert MTB/RIF showed a trend to reduced sensitivity (P=0.09) and significantly reduced negative predictive value (P=0.01). The negative predictive value for rifampicin resistance was 99.4%.XpertMTB/RIF outperformed smear microscopy, established a diagnosis in a significant proportion of patients with smear-negative TB, detected many highly likely TB cases missed by culture, and accurately ruled out rifampicin-resistant TB. Sample-specific factors had limited impact on performance. Performance in patients infected with HIV, especially those with advanced immunosuppression, warrants further study.[Treatment and diagnostics of tuberculosis: moving slowly forward].Development of new drugs for the treatment of drug sensitive and drug resistant tuberculosis is badly needed. Substantial progress has been made in the field and presently six new drug components are in clinical phase I and II trials. Drugs approved for other indications e.g. newer fluoroquinolones and oxazolidinones are also being assessed in human phase II and III trials. Efforts are made to develop easy-to-handle diagnostic tools that will allow early detection of potential MDR or XDR cases. The Xpert RIF/MTB is a prototype of such an invention. At long last the field is moving slowly forward.Comparison of the Xpert MTB/RIF test with an IS6110-TaqMan real-time PCR assay for direct detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in respiratory and nonrespiratory specimens.The sensitivities of the Xpert MTB/RIF test and an in-house IS6110-based real-time PCR using TaqMan probes (IS6110-TaqMan assay) for the detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex (MTBC) DNA were compared by use of 117 clinical specimens (97 culture positive and 20 culture negative for MTBC) that were frozen in sediment. The 97 clinical specimens included 60 respiratory and 37 nonrespiratory specimens distributed into 36 smear-positive and 61 smear-negative specimens. Among the 97 culture-positive specimens, 4 had rifampin-resistant isolates. Both methods were highly specific and exhibited excellent sensitivity (100%) with smear-positive specimens. The sensitivity of the Xpert MTB/RIF test with the whole smear-negative specimens was more reduced than that of the IS6110-TaqMan assay (48 versus 69%, P = 0.005). Both methods exhibited similar sensitivities with smear-negative respiratory specimens, but the Xpert MTB/RIF test had lower sensitivity with smear-negative nonrespiratory specimens than the IS6110-TaqMan assay (37 versus 71%, P = 0.013). Finally, the sensitivities of the Xpert MTB/RIF test and the IS6110-TaqMan assay were 79% and 84%, respectively, with respiratory specimens and 53% and 78%, respectively (P = 0.013), with nonrespiratory specimens. The Xpert MTB/RIF test correctly detected the rifampin resistance in smear-positive specimens but not in the one smear-negative specimen. The Xpert MTB/RIF test is a simple rapid method well adapted to a routine laboratory that appeared to be as sensitive as the IS6110-TaqMan assay with respiratory specimens but less sensitive with paucibacillary specimens, such as smear-negative nonrespiratory specimens.Rapid and efficient detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in respiratory and non-respiratory samples.The detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis using a new commercial real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay (Xpert™ MTB/RIF) was evaluated on 91 respiratory and 89 non-respiratory samples recovered from 132 patients suspected of tuberculosis (TB). Overall, 31 (17.2%) of the 180 samples, including 17 respiratory and 14 non-respiratory (respectively 17 and 12 PCR-positive), yielded M. tuberculosis on culture. The sensitivity and specificity of PCR were respectively 100% and 100%, and 85.7% and 97.3% for respiratory and non-respiratory samples. Although the test is validated only for respiratory samples, our findings suggest that it could be useful for the diagnosis of extra-pulmonary TB.[Evaluation of Xpert MTB/RIF results for the detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in clinical samples].Tuberculosis is still a major global health problem. Nowadays nucleic acid amplification tests which are recommended by the World Health Organization (WHO) become popular methods for the rapid detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex (MTC). Recently introduced commercial Xpert MTB/RIF (Cepheid, USA) system is also a molecular method based on real-time polymerase chain reaction for simultaneous detection of both MTC and rifampicin resistance in the clinical sample. The sample processing, nucleic acid extraction, amplification and detection of known mutations related to rifampicin resistance are performed in a single cartridge in this integrated system and the results are obtained in two hours. The aim of this study was to evaluate the performance of Xpert MTB/RIF system for the detection of M.tuberculosis in pre-processed clinical samples by comparing the results obtained by Bactec 460TB 12B (BD Diagnostic, USA), Löwenstein-Jensen (LJ) culture and direct microscopy of smears stained with Ziehl- Neelsen (ZN). A total of 85 clinical specimens (50 sputum, 25 bronchoalveolar lavage, five thorasynthesis fluid and five urine samples) obtained from tuberculosis-suspected patients were included to the study. All specimens were decontaminated and this decontaminated suspension was used in the diagnostic methods, except for Xpert MTB/RIF process. Twenty-five (29%) of the samples yielded positive result with Bactec 460TB, 25 (29%) were found positive with Xpert MTB/RIF, 15 (18%) were found positive with LJ and 11 (13%) were found positive with ZN staining method. High consistency was detected between the results of Bactec 460TB and Xpert MTB/RIF when Bactec 460TB was considered as the gold standard method (r= 0.943; p= 0.000). One specimen yielded false positive result with Xpert MTB/RIF when compared to the reference method. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of Xpert MTB/RIF test were then estimated as 96%, 98%, 96% and 98%, respectively. No resistance were detected for the tested isolates. This study suggested that the sensitivity of Xpert MTB/RIF system in direct detection of M.tuberculosis in smear positive and smear negative samples was consistent with the reference methods. Moreover, the MTB/RIF test provided sensitive detection of tuberculosis in less than two hours.Evaluation of the Cepheid Xpert MTB/RIF assay for direct detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex in respiratory specimens.A total of 217 specimens submitted for routine smear and culture from three different sites within the western United States were used to evaluate the GeneXpert MTB/RIF assay (for research use only) (Cepheid, Sunnyvale, CA). Overall agreement compared to culture was 89% (98% for smear positives and 72% for smear negatives) for detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis.Rapid molecular detection of extrapulmonary tuberculosis by the automated GeneXpert MTB/RIF system.In total, 521 nonrespiratory specimens (91 urine, 30 gastric aspirate, 245 tissue, 113 pleural fluid, 19 cerebrospinal fluid [CSF], and 23 stool specimens) submitted to the German National Reference Laboratory for Mycobacteria (NRL) from May 2009 to August 2010 were comparatively investigated with the new molecular-based GeneXpert MTB/RIF (Xpert) assay system and conventional liquid and solid culture methods. Twenty (3.8%) of the 521 specimens gave no interpretable result. Whereas the sensitivity of the Xpert assay with tissue specimens was 69.0% (20 out of 29 culture-positive cases detected), 100% sensitivity was found with the urine and stool specimens. The combined sensitivity and specificity of the Xpert assay were calculated to be 77.3% and 98.2%, respectively.Rapid molecular detection of tuberculosis.Rapid detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex and rifampin resistance in smear-negative clinical samples by use of an integrated real-time PCR method.Sixty-four of 85 (75.3%) smear-negative respiratory (n = 78) and nonrespiratory (n = 7) samples with positive cultures of Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex (MTC) were detected by the GeneXpert system using the Xpert MTB/RIF assay (GX). In addition, GX found rpoB mutations in all six of the rifampin-resistant strains detected. The test was negative in 20 culture-negative and 20 nontuberculous culture-positive samples (100% specificity). GX offers high potential for the diagnosis of tuberculosis due to its capacity for direct detection of MTC, its rapidity, and its simplicity.The urgent need for new diagnostics for symptomatic tuberculosis in children.TB is a major public health problem causing 9 million cases, of which 10%-15% occur in children each year. Historically, children have received lower priority within TB control activities because they are considered less infectious than smear-positive adults. This review argues that TB is a public health problem in children and that poor awareness of the magnitude of the problem emanates from the lack of suitable pediatric diagnostic tests for TB and the characteristics of the disease in young children. New TB diagnostics, approved for use in adults have not been evaluated in children, although there is limited evidence that some of these tests hold promise and should be assessed. There are several approaches that could be used to improve the performance of tests in pediatric patients. These include improved methods for specimen collection and processing. The value of collecting specimens from multiple anatomical sites to shorten the diagnostic process and improve sensitivity was reported recently and the combination of expectorated sputum, nasopharyngeal aspirate, induce sputum and gastric aspirate may result in a similar yield than specimens collected over consecutive days. Methods for sample collection such as fine needle aspiration biopsy should be used more frequently and the Microscopic Observation Drug Sensitivity (MODS) assay has higher sensitivity than LJ culture. There is however very scanty evidence of the performance of other promising tests such as the fully automated NAAT (Xpert) and Line Probe Assays and loop mediated isothermal amplification. Although the future holds promise, increased support from international organizations and funding agencies is needed to promote the evaluation and development of new diagnostics that are suitable for TB in children.Xpert(®) MTB/RIF for point-of-care diagnosis of TB in high-HIV burden, resource-limited countries: hype or hope?Despite the identification of Mycobacterium tuberculosis as the cause of tuberculosis (TB) more than a century ago, diagnosing TB in resource-poor countries remains a challenge, especially in people living with HIV. In the past decade, important research investments have been made towards the development of new diagnostics for TB and the Xpert(®) MTB/RIF assay (Cepheid, CA, USA) has emerged as one of the most promising. In this article, we review the current knowledge on Xpert MTB/RIF, discuss the potential value of Xpert MTB/RIF as a point-of-care diagnostic for drug-sensitive and drug-resistant TB, and outline the potential indications for the assay in resource-limited, high-HIV burden settings. We also discuss key research questions that need to be addressed prior to possible large-scale implementation of the assay.Rapid molecular detection of tuberculosis and rifampin resistance.Global control of tuberculosis is hampered by slow, insensitive diagnostic methods, particularly for the detection of drug-resistant forms and in patients with human immunodeficiency virus infection. Early detection is essential to reduce the death rate and interrupt transmission, but the complexity and infrastructure needs of sensitive methods limit their accessibility and effect.We assessed the performance of Xpert MTB/RIF, an automated molecular test for Mycobacterium tuberculosis (MTB) and resistance to rifampin (RIF), with fully integrated sample processing in 1730 patients with suspected drug-sensitive or multidrug-resistant pulmonary tuberculosis. Eligible patients in Peru, Azerbaijan, South Africa, and India provided three sputum specimens each. Two specimens were processed with N-acetyl-L-cysteine and sodium hydroxide before microscopy, solid and liquid culture, and the MTB/RIF test, and one specimen was used for direct testing with microscopy and the MTB/RIF test.Among culture-positive patients, a single, direct MTB/RIF test identified 551 of 561 patients with smear-positive tuberculosis (98.2%) and 124 of 171 with smear-negative tuberculosis (72.5%). The test was specific in 604 of 609 patients without tuberculosis (99.2%). Among patients with smear-negative, culture-positive tuberculosis, the addition of a second MTB/RIF test increased sensitivity by 12.6 percentage points and a third by 5.1 percentage points, to a total of 90.2%. As compared with phenotypic drug-susceptibility testing, MTB/RIF testing correctly identified 200 of 205 patients (97.6%) with rifampin-resistant bacteria and 504 of 514 (98.1%) with rifampin-sensitive bacteria. Sequencing resolved all but two cases in favor of the MTB/RIF assay.The MTB/RIF test provided sensitive detection of tuberculosis and rifampin resistance directly from untreated sputum in less than 2 hours with minimal hands-on time. (Funded by the Foundation for Innovative New Diagnostics.)Containment of bioaerosol infection risk by the Xpert MTB/RIF assay and its applicability to point-of-care settings.The recently introduced Xpert MTB/RIF assay (Xpert) has point-of-care potential, but its capacity for biohazard containment remained to be studied. We compared the bioaerosols generated by the Xpert assay to acid-fast bacillus (AFB) microscope slide smear preparation. The Xpert assay sample treatment reagent (SR) was also studied for its sterilizing capacity, stability, and effect on assay sensitivity after prolonged treatment. During the preparation of AFB smears, sputum samples spiked with Mycobacterium bovis BCG at 5 × 10(8) CFU/ml produced 16 and 325 CFU/m(3) air measured with an Andersen impactor or BioSampler, respectively. In contrast, neither the sample preparation steps for the Xpert assay nor its automated processing produced any culturable bioaerosols. In testing of SR sterilizing capacity, clinical sputum samples from strongly smear-positive tuberculosis patients treated with SR at a 2:1 ratio eliminated Mycobacterium tuberculosis growth in all but 1/39 or 3/45 samples cultured on solid or liquid medium, respectively. These few unsterilized samples had a mean 13.1-day delay in the time to positive culture. SR treatment at a 3:1 ratio eliminated growth in all samples. SR retained a greater than 6-log-unit killing capacity despite storage at temperatures spanning 4 to 45°C for at least 3 months. The effect of prolonged SR sample treatment was also studied. Spiked sputum samples could be incubated in SR for up to 3 days without affecting Xpert sensitivity for M. tuberculosis detection and up to 8 h without affecting specificity for rifampin resistance detection. These results suggest that benchtop use of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay limits infection risk to the user.Rapid detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis and rifampin resistance by use of on-demand, near-patient technology.Current nucleic acid amplification methods to detect Mycobacterium tuberculosis are complex, labor-intensive, and technically challenging. We developed and performed the first analysis of the Cepheid Gene Xpert System's MTB/RIF assay, an integrated hands-free sputum-processing and real-time PCR system with rapid on-demand, near-patient technology, to simultaneously detect M. tuberculosis and rifampin resistance. Analytic tests of M. tuberculosis DNA demonstrated a limit of detection (LOD) of 4.5 genomes per reaction. Studies using sputum spiked with known numbers of M. tuberculosis CFU predicted a clinical LOD of 131 CFU/ml. Killing studies showed that the assay's buffer decreased M. tuberculosis viability by at least 8 logs, substantially reducing biohazards. Tests of 23 different commonly occurring rifampin resistance mutations demonstrated that all 23 (100%) would be identified as rifampin resistant. An analysis of 20 nontuberculosis mycobacteria species confirmed high assay specificity. A small clinical validation study of 107 clinical sputum samples from suspected tuberculosis cases in Vietnam detected 29/29 (100%) smear-positive culture-positive cases and 33/39 (84.6%) or 38/53 (71.7%) smear-negative culture-positive cases, as determined by growth on solid medium or on both solid and liquid media, respectively. M. tuberculosis was not detected in 25/25 (100%) of the culture-negative samples. A study of 64 smear-positive culture-positive sputa from retreatment tuberculosis cases in Uganda detected 63/64 (98.4%) culture-positive cases and 9/9 (100%) cases of rifampin resistance. Rifampin resistance was excluded in 54/55 (98.2%) susceptible cases. Specificity rose to 100% after correcting for a conventional susceptibility test error. In conclusion, this highly sensitive and simple-to-use system can detect M. tuberculosis directly from sputum in less than 2 h.Evaluation of Xpert MTB/RIF and MODS assay for the diagnosis of pediatric tuberculosis.Tuberculosis (TB) in children is rarely confirmed due to the lack of effective diagnostic tools; only 10 to 15% of pediatric TB is smear positive due to paucibacillary samples and the difficulty of obtaining high-quality specimens from children. We evaluate here the accuracy of Xpert MTB/RIF in comparison with the Micoroscopic observation drug susceptibility (MODS) assay for diagnosis of TB in children using samples stored during a previously reported evaluation of the MODS assay.Ninety-six eligible children presenting with suspected TB were recruited consecutively at Pham Ngoc Thach Hospital in Ho Chi Minh City Viet Nam between May to December 2008 and tested by Ziehl-Neelsen smear, MODS and Mycobacterial growth Indicator (MGIT, Becton Dickinson) culture. All samples sent by the treating clinician for testing were included in the analysis. An aliquot of processed sample deposit was stored at -20°C and tested in the present study by Xpert MTB/RIF test. 183 samples from 73 children were available for analysis by Xpert. Accuracy measures of MODS and Xpert were summarized.The sensitivity (%) in detecting children with a clinical diagnosis of TB for smear, MODS and Xpert were 37.9 [95% CI 25.5; 51.6], 51.7 [38.2; 65.0] and 50.0 [36.6; 63.4], respectively (per patient analysis). Xpert was significantly more sensitive than smear (P=0.046). Testing of additional samples did not increase case detection for MODS while testing of a second sputum sample by Xpert detected only two additional cases. The positive and negative predictive values (%) of Xpert were 100.0 [88.0; 100.0] and 34.1 [20.5; 49.9], respectively, while those of MODS were 96.8 [83.3; 99.9] and 33.3 [19.6; 49.5].MODS culture and Xpert MTB/RIF test have similar sensitivities for the detection of pediatric TB. Xpert MTB RIF is able to detect tuberculosis and rifampicin resistance within two hours. MODS allows isolation of cultures for further drug susceptibility testing but requires approximately one week to become positive. Testing of multiple samples by xpert detected only two additional cases and the benefits must be considered against costs in each setting. Further research is required to evaluate the optimal integration of Xpert into pediatric testing algorithms.High diagnostic yield of tuberculosis from screening urine samples from HIV-infected patients with advanced immunodeficiency using the Xpert MTB/RIF assay.We determined the diagnostic yield of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for tuberculosis (TB) when testing small volumes of urine from ambulatory HIV-infected patients before starting antiretroviral therapy in South Africa. Compared with a gold standard of sputum culture, the sensitivity of urine Xpert among those with CD4 cell counts of <50, 50-100, and >100 cells per microliter were 44.4%, 25.0%, and 2.7% (P = 0.001), respectively. Urine Xpert testing provides a means of rapid TB diagnosis in patients with advanced immunodeficiency and poor prognosis. These data are indicative of high rates of TB dissemination and renal involvement in this clinical population.Suitability of Xpert MTB/RIF and genotype MTBDRplus for patient selection for a tuberculosis clinical trial.Participation criteria for clinical trials in pulmonary tuberculosis commonly include confirmation of sputum positive for mycobacteria and an indication of drug susceptibility before treatment is initiated. We investigated the suitability of two novel sputum-based nucleic acid amplification methods for patient selection in a recent early bactericidal activity study. Spontaneously expectorated sputum samples of 140 consecutive pulmonary tuberculosis patients were examined with direct fluorescence microscopy, Genotype MTBDRplus assay (MTBDR), Xpert MTB/RIF assay (Xpert), and liquid mycobacterial culture. The methods detected mycobacteria or mycobacterial DNA in 96.8%, 90.5%, 92.9%, and 92.1% of samples, respectively. MTBDR, Xpert, and liquid culture were 100% concordant for detection of resistance to rifampin. Sensitivity and specificity of MTBDR for detection of isoniazid resistance were 83.3% and 100%, respectively. For quantification of mycobacterial sputum load, we found a correlation between Xpert DNA amplification cycle thresholds, time to positivity, and microscopy smear grade. The best correlation was found between Xpert and time to positivity (r = 0.54), which were both correlated with smear microscopy with r values equal to -0.40 and -0.48, respectively. We conclude that MTBDR and Xpert are suitable screening tools for determining rifampin resistance in sputum microscopy smear-positive patients before participation in tuberculosis trials. Xpert should be further explored as a surrogate measurement for sputum mycobacterial load.Rapid diagnosis of pediatric intrathoracic tuberculosis from stool samples using the Xpert MTB/RIF Assay: a pilot study.Impact of Xpert MTB/RIF testing on tuberculosis management and outcomes in hospitalized patients in Uganda.The clinical impact of Xpert MTB/RIF for tuberculosis (TB) diagnosis in high HIV-prevalence settings is unknown.To determine the diagnostic accuracy and impact of Xpert MTB/RIF among high-risk TB suspects.WE PROSPECTIVELY ENROLLED CONSECUTIVE, HOSPITALIZED, UGANDAN TB SUSPECTS IN TWO PHASES: baseline phase in which Xpert MTB/RIF results were not reported to clinicians and an implementation phase in which results were reported. We determined the diagnostic accuracy of Xpert MTB/RIF in reference to culture (solid and liquid) and compared patient outcomes by study phase.477 patients were included (baseline phase 287, implementation phase 190). Xpert MTB/RIF had high sensitivity (187/237, 79%, 95% CI: 73-84%) and specificity (190/199, 96%, 95% CI: 92-98%) for culture-positive TB overall, but sensitivity was lower (34/81, 42%, 95% CI: 31-54%) among smear-negative TB cases. Xpert MTB/RIF reduced median days-to-TB detection for all TB cases (1 [IQR 0-26] vs. 0 [IQR 0-1], p<0.001), and for smear-negative TB (35 [IQR 22-55] vs. 22 [IQR 0-33], p=0.001). However, median days-to-TB treatment was similar for all TB cases (1 [IQR 0-5] vs. 0 [IQR 0-2], p=0.06) and for smear-negative TB (7 [IQR 3-53] vs. 6 [IQR 1-61], p=0.78). Two-month mortality was also similar between study phases among 252 TB cases (17% vs. 14%, difference +3%, 95% CI: -21% to +27%, p=0.80), and among 87 smear-negative TB cases (28% vs. 22%, difference +6%, 95% CI: -34 to +46%, p=0.77).Xpert MTB/RIF facilitated more accurate and earlier TB diagnosis, leading to a higher proportion of TB suspects with a confirmed TB diagnosis prior to hospital discharge in a high HIV/low MDR TB prevalence setting. However, our study did not detect a decrease in two-month mortality following implementation of Xpert MTB/RIF possibly because of insufficient powering, differences in empiric TB treatment rates, and disease severity between study phases.Xpert® MTB/RIF diagnosed disseminated smear-negative MDR-TB in a sub-district hospital in India.Implementation of Xpert MTB/RIF for routine point-of-care diagnosis of tuberculosis at the primary care level.Xpert MTB/RIF (Xpert) offers rapid detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis and rifampicin resistance. However, little is known about routine point-of-care (POC) use in high TB/HIV burden settings. We describe our experiences of launching Xpert as the POC, initial diagnostic for all TB suspects at a primary healthcare clinic in Johannesburg, South Africa. Noted important benefits of POC Xpert were fewer clinic visits, rapid detection of TB and rifampicin resistance, real-time assessment of accompanying household members of new TB cases, and increased staff motivation for TB screening. While Xpert results are available within 2 hours, actual turn-around time was longer for most patients because of sample preparation time and clinic congestion. Consequently, a GX4 instrument did not result in a 16-test capacity during an 8-hour working day, and some patients did not receive same-day results. Loss to follow-up was an unforeseen challenge, overcome by clinic flow changes, marking of clinic files, documenting patients' physical description and locating patients in the clinic by cell phone. Staff with high school education successfully performed the assay after minimal training. Human resource requirements were considerable, with a minimum of 2 staff needed to supervise sputum collection, process sputum, perform assays, and document results for an average of 15 TB suspects daily. POC placement of the instrument transferred logistical responsibilities to the clinic, including quality assurance, maintenance, stock control and cartridge disposal. POC use of Xpert is feasible at the primary healthcare level but must be accompanied by financial, operational and logistical support.The Xpert® MTB/RIF assay evaluation in South Korea, a country with an intermediate tuberculosis burden.A central hospital laboratory in South Korea.To evaluate the usefulness of the Xpert® MTB/RIF assay in a country with an intermediate tuberculosis burden.A total of 71 real-time polymerase chain reaction-positive sputum sediments were tested within 24 h by the Xpert MTB/RIF assay. Mycobacterium tuberculosis detection was compared with smear microscopy and culture. Rifampicin (RMP) resistance was compared with a culture-based method and rpoB gene sequencing. We also assessed the limit of detection for mutant proportions and time savings in diagnosis.The Xpert MTB/RIF assay detected M. tuberculosis in 71 (100%) specimens (32 smear-positive, 39 smear-negative). This assay showed 100% (62/62) concordance with drug resistance confirmed by culture and 98.4% (61/62) concordance with sequencing. A specimen containing approximately 50% of mutant p.His526Tyr was falsely interpreted as wild-type bacilli by this assay. The minimal detection ratio was 5:1 of mutant vs. wild-type cells. The median time saved was 18.5 days (range 9-30) for the diagnosis of M. tuberculosis and 81.5 days (65-136) for RMP susceptibility in smear-negative, culture-positive patients.The Xpert MTB/RIF assay showed high sensitivity in detecting M. tuberculosis with information on RMP resistance, and had a more rapid time to diagnosis compared to conventional tests; however, the location and amount of mutation may affect test sensitivity.The diagnostic performance of the GenoType MTBDRplus version 2 line probe assay is equivalent to that of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay.Molecular diagnostics for Mycobacterium tuberculosis have recently been endorsed by the World Health Organization. The Xpert MTB/RIF assay was endorsed for use on patient material, regardless of smear gradation, while the GenoType MTBDRplus (version 1) has been limited for use on smear-positive patient material. In this study, we evaluated the diagnostic performance of the Xpert MTB/RIF and GenoType MTBDRplus (version 2) assays on smear-positive and smear-negative patient specimens submitted to a high-throughput diagnostic laboratory. A total of 282 consecutive specimens were subjected to the two new molecular assays, and their performance characteristics were assessed relative to the routine diagnostic standard. Both assays showed similar diagnostic performance characteristics. The sensitivities of the GenoType MTBDRplus (v2.0) and Xpert MTB/RIF assays for the detection of culture-positive M. tuberculosis were 73.1% and 71.2%, respectively, while the specificities of both assays were 100%. Both assays were able to diagnose the presence of M. tuberculosis in 57 to 58% of smear-negative cases, suggesting that the performance characteristics were dependent on bacillary load. The detection of M. tuberculosis in culture-negative specimens confirmed that molecular assays should not be used for treatment monitoring. The sensitivity and specificity for rifampin resistance detection were 100% in both assays; however, the GenoType MTBDRplus (v2.0) assay provided additional information on isoniazid susceptibility. The GenoType MTBDRplus (v2.0) assay will complement the Xpert MTB/RIF screening assay by validating rifampin susceptibility and providing information on isoniazid susceptibility. In addition, the GenoType MTBDRplus (v2.0) assay will provide pharmacogenetic information that may be critical in guiding appropriate treatment.A diagnostic accuracy study of Xpert®MTB/RIF in HIV-positive patients with high clinical suspicion of pulmonary tuberculosis in Lima, Peru.Diagnosis of pulmonary tuberculosis (TB) among human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) patients remains complex and demands easy to perform and accurate tests. Xpert®MTB/RIF (MTB/RIF) is a molecular TB diagnostic test which is rapid and convenient; the test requires minimal human resources and reports results within two hours. The majority of performance studies of MTB/RIF have been performed in high HIV burden settings, thus TB diagnostic studies among HIV patients in low HIV prevalence settings such as Peru are still needed.From April 2010 to May 2011, HIV-positive patients with high clinical suspicion of TB were enrolled from two tertiary hospitals in Lima, Peru. Detection of TB by MTB/RIF was compared to a composite reference standard Löwenstein-Jensen (LJ) and liquid culture. Detection of rifampicin resistance was compared to the LJ proportion method. We included 131 patients, the median CD4 cell count was 154.5 cells/mm(3) and 45 (34.4%) had TB. For TB detection among HIV patients, sensitivity of MTB/RIF was 97.8% (95% CI 88.4-99.6) (44/45); specificity was 97.7% (95% CI 91.9-99.4) (84/86); the positive predictive value was 95.7% (95% CI 85.5-98.8) (44/46); and the negative predictive value, 98.8% (95% CI 93.6-99.8) (84/85). MTB/RIF detected 13/14 smear-negative TB cases, outperforming smear microscopy [97.8% (44/45) vs. 68.9% (31/45); p = 0.0002]. For rifampicin resistance detection, sensitivity of MTB/RIF was 100% (95% CI 61.0-100.0) (6/6); specificity was 91.0% (95% CI 76.4-96.9) (30/33); the positive predictive value was 66.7% (95% CI 35.4-87.9) (6/9); and the negative predictive value was 100% (95% CI 88.7 -100.0) (30/30).In HIV patients in our population with a high clinical suspicion of TB, MTB/RIF performed well for TB diagnosis and outperformed smear microscopy.Performance of the Xpert® MTB/RIF assay in an active case-finding strategy: a pilot study from Tanzania.In this pilot study, we evaluated the Xpert® MTB/RIF assay in an active case-finding strategy, using two spot sputum samples collected within a 1-hour interval from household contacts of smear-positive TB index cases. Tuberculosis (TB) confirmed by culture served as the reference standard. Among 219 enrolled contacts, the yield of active TB was 2.3%. While the sensitivity of smear microscopy was 60% (95%CI 14.7-94.7), Xpert MTB/RIF achieved a sensitivity of 100% (95%CI 47.81-100.0). All culture-confirmed cases tested positive by Xpert MTB/RIF on the first submitted sample, suggesting that the evaluation of only one sample could be sufficient for TB diagnosis in this context.Performance characteristics of the Cepheid Xpert MTB/RIF test in a tuberculosis prevalence survey.Xpert MTB/RIF ("Xpert") is a molecular test for detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis (MTB) in sputum. Performance characteristics have been established for its use during passive tuberculosis (TB) case detection in symptomatic TB suspects, but Xpert performance has not been assessed in other settings. Objectives were to determine Xpert performance and costs in the context of a TB prevalence survey.This was a diagnostic sub-study of a TB prevalence survey conducted in gold mining companies in South Africa. Sputa (one per participant) were tested using smear microscopy, liquid culture (reference comparator), and Xpert. Costs were collected using an ingredients approach and analyzed using a public health program perspective. 6893 participants provided a sputum specimen. 187/6893 (2.7%) were positive for MTB in culture, 144/6893 (2.1%) were positive for MTB by Xpert, and 91/6893 (1.3%) were positive for acid fast bacilli by microsocopy. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value for detection of MTB by Xpert were 62.6% (95% confidence interval [CI] 55.2, 69.5), 99.6% (99.4, 99.7), 81.3% (73.9, 87.3), and 98.9 (98.6, 98.8); agreement between Xpert and culture was 98.5% (98.2, 98.8). Sensitivity of microscopy was 17.6% (12.5, 23.9). When individuals with a history of TB treatment were excluded from the analysis, Xpert specificity was 99.8 (99.7, 99.9) and PPV was 90.6 (83.3, 95.4) for detection of MTB. For the testing scenario of 7000 specimens with 2.7% of specimens culture positive for MTB, costs were $165,690 for Xpert and $115,360 for the package of microscopy plus culture.In the context of a TB prevalence survey, the Xpert diagnostic yield was substantially higher than that of microscopy yet lower than that of liquid culture. Xpert may be useful as a sole test for TB case detection in prevalence surveys, particularly in settings lacking capacity for liquid culture.Rapid molecular detection of pulmonary tuberculosis in HIV-infected patients in Santiago, Chile.Santiago, Chile, has a mean annual tuberculosis (TB) rate of 13 per 100 000 population; however, TB incidence in human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infected individuals is at least 20 times higher.To assess the accuracy of rapid molecular testing for pulmonary TB (PTB) detection in routine care in HIV-infected patients.Cross-sectional study, conducted prospectively in five hospitals between March 2010 and June 2011. HIV-positive subjects with suspected PTB provided sputum or mouth wash samples that were directly processed for acid-fast smear, mycobacterial cultures and Xpert® MTB/RIF. Positive test results were reported on the same day.We enrolled 166 subjects into the study; 50.6% provided two sputum samples, 33.1% only one sputum sample and 16.3% a mouth wash sample. The prevalence of TB was 8.1% (13/160). Diagnostic sensitivity increased from 66.7% (95%CI 39.1-86.2) for acid-fast smear to 91.7% (95%CI 64.6-98.5) for Xpert MTB/RIF, with comparable specificity at 98.6% (146/148, 95%CI 95.2-99.6) and 99.3% (147/148, 95%CI 96.3-99.9). Xpert MTB/RIF allowed early detection of rifampicin resistance in 16.6% of cases, with rapid adjustment to multidrug-resistant treatment.Xpert MTB/RIF provided earlier TB diagnosis in 25% more cases than acid-fast smear alone. Its implementation should be considered for TB diagnosis in HIV-positive patients even outside TB-endemic areas.Rapid implementation of new TB diagnostic tests: is it too soon for a global roll-out of Xpert MTB/RIF?In 2011 the World Health Organization approved Xpert MTB/RIF for tuberculosis diagnosis and recommended its rapid implementation. Xpert MTB/RIF is accurate: sensitivity is 72.5 -98.2% (smear-negative and -positive cases, respectively) and specificity 99.2%. Benefits include same-day diagnosis and simultaneous detection of rifampicin resistance. However, the test has some shortcomings and has not had time for thorough evaluation. Cost-effectiveness studies are difficult to perform and few have been completed. Existing data suggest cost-effectiveness in some, but not all, settings. The urgent need for better diagnostics is evident. Yet, serial implementation of new technologies causes ineffective spending and fragmentation of services. How new tests are incorporated into existing diagnostic algorithms affects both outcomes and costs. More detailed data on performance, effect on patient-important outcomes, and costs when used with adjunct tests are needed for each setting before implementation. While awaiting further clarification it seems prudent to slow its implementation among resource-constrained tuberculosis control programs.An evaluation of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay and detection of false-positive rifampicin resistance in Mycobacterium tuberculosis.Recent reports suggest that false-positive rifampicin resistance may be assigned by the Xpert MTB/RIF assay. We analysed 169 specimens using the MTB/RIF assay. Using culture as the gold standard, we found that the assay had 100% sensitivity and specificity for detecting M. tuberculosis. However, we found that the assay incorrectly assigned rifampicin resistance in 4/13 (31%) of cases.The diagnostic accuracy of urine-based Xpert MTB/RIF in HIV-infected hospitalized patients who are smear-negative or sputum scarce.Hospitals in sub-Saharan Africa are inundated with HIV-infected patients and tuberculosis (TB) is the commonest opportunistic infection in this sub-group. Up to one third of TB-HIV co-infected patients fail to produce a sputum sample (sputum scarce) and diagnosis is thus often delayed or missed. We investigated the sensitivity of urine-based methods (Xpert MTB/RIF, LAM strip test and LAM ELISA) in such patients.281 HIV-infected hospitalised patients with clinically suspected TB provided a spot urine sample. The reference standard was culture positivity for Mycobacterium tuberculosis on ≥1 sputum or extra-pulmonary sample. MTB/RIF was performed using 1 ml of both unprocessed and, when possible, concentrated urine. Each unconcentrated urine sample was also tested using the Clearview LAM ELISA and Alere LAM strip test. 42% (116/242) of patients had culture-proven TB. 18% (20/54) were sputum scarce. In sputum-scarce patients, the sensitivity of urine MTB/RIF and LAM ELISA was 40% (95%CI: 22-61) and 60% (95%CI: 39-78), respectively. Urine MTB/RIF specificity was 98% (95%CI: 95-100). Combined sensitivity of urine LAM ELISA and MTB/RIF was better than MTB/RIF alone [MTB/RIF and LAM: 70% (95%CI: 48-85) vs. MTB/RIF: 40% (95%CI: 22-61), p = 0.03]. Significant predictors of urine MTB/RIF positivity were CD4<50 cells/ml (p = 0.001), elevated protein-to-creatinine ratio (p<0.001) and LAM ELISA positivity (p<0.001). Urine centrifugation and pelleting significantly increased the sensitivity of MTB/RIF over unprocessed urine in paired samples [42% (95%CI: 26-58) vs. 8% (95%CI: 0-16), p<0.001]. Urine MTB/RIF-generated C(T) values correlated poorly with markers of bacillary burden (smear grade and time-to-positivity).This preliminary study indicates that urine-based MTB/RIF, alone or in combination with LAM antigen detection, may potentially aid the diagnosis of TB in HIV-infected patients with advanced immunosuppression when sputum-based diagnosis is not possible. Concentration of urine prior to MTB/RIF-testing significantly improves sensitivity.Evaluation of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay at a tertiary care referral hospital in a setting where tuberculosis and HIV infection are highly endemic.BACKGROUND. There were 1.45 million deaths from tuberculosis in 2011. A substantial proportion of active pulmonary tuberculosis cases in countries where tuberculosis, human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection, and AIDS are highly endemic remain undiagnosed because of the reliance on sputum-smear microscopy. This study evaluated the performance of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay at a tertiary care referral center in Zambia, a country where the burden of tuberculosis and HIV infection is high. METHODS. A total of 881 adult inpatients admitted to University Teaching Hospital in Lusaka who were able to produce sputum were enrolled and analyzed in the study, irrespective of admission diagnosis. Sputum specimens were analyzed by fluorescence smear microscopy, the Xpert MTB/RIF assay, mycobacterial growth indicator tube (MGIT) culture,and MGIT drug-susceptibility testing. The sensitivity and specificity of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay were evaluated using culture as the gold standard. RESULTS. Culture-confirmed tuberculosis was found in 201 of 881 patients (22.8%). The specificity of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay was 95.0% (95% confidence interval [CI], 92.4%–96.8%),and the sensitivity was 86.1% (95% CI, 80.3%–90.4%). In sputum smear–negative, culture-positive cases, the assay was 74.7% sensitive (95% CI, 64.6%–82.8%), identifying 71 additional tuberculosis cases that were not detected by smear microscopy.A total of 18 of 111 patients with tuberculosis who were tested (16.2%) had multidrug-resistant (MDR) tuberculosis.The sensitivity and specificity of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for detecting culture-confirmed, rifampicin-resistant tuberculosis was 81.3% (95% CI, 53.7%–95.0%) and 97.5% (95% CI,90.4%–99.6%), respectively. CONCLUSIONS. The Xpert MTB/RIF assay performs better than smear microscopy in an inpatient setting in a country where tuberculosis and HIV infection are highly endemic. Assessment of its usefulness and cost-effectiveness for increased detection of tuberculosis cases missed by sputum smear and for concomitant screening for MDR tuberculosis among adult inpatients attending tertiary care referral centers in other countries with a high burden of tuberculosis and HIV infection is warranted [corrected].Rapid molecular diagnosis of pulmonary tuberculosis in children using nasopharyngeal specimens.A rapid diagnosis of pediatric pulmonary tuberculosis (PTB) using Xpert MTB/RIF (Mycobacterium tuberculosis/rifampicin) automated testing on induced sputum (IS) is possible, but the capacity for performing IS is limited. The diagnosis using a nasopharyngeal aspirate (NPA), which can be non-invasively obtained, is desirable.Paired specimens (NPA and IS) were tested using smear, liquid culture and Xpert. The diagnostic accuracy of Xpert and smear was compared with culture for different specimens in children with suspected PTB.There were 535 children [median age 19 months, 117 (21·9%) HIV-infected] who had one IS and one NPA specimen; 396 had two paired specimens. A positive smear, Xpert test or culture occurred in 30 (5.6%), 81 (15.1%) and 87 children (16.3%), respectively. The culture yield was higher from IS (84/87, 96.6%) vs NPA (61/87, 70.1%, P < .001). Amongst children with two paired specimens, 63 culture-confirmed cases occurred [60 (95.2%) IS vs 48 (76.2%) NPA, P = .002]. The sensitivity of two Xpert tests was similar for IS and NPAs [(45/63) 71% vs (41/63) 65%, P = .444)]; the sensitivity of smear was lower for IS (21/63, 33%) and NPA (16/63, 25%). The incremental yield from a second IS was 9 cases (17.6%) by culture and 9 (25%) by Xpert testing; a second NPA increased the culture yield by 10 (26.3%) and Xpert by 11 (36.7%). Xpert specificity was 99.1% (98.1-100) for IS and 98.2% (96.8-99.6) for NPAs. Xpert testing provided faster results than culture (median 0 vs 15 days, P < .001).Xpert testing on 2 NPAs is useful in children with suspected PTB, particularly in settings where IS and culture are not feasible.Delay in commencing treatment for MDR TB at a specialised TB treatment centre in KwaZulu-Natal.Background. According to the National Department of Health (NDoH) guidelines, patients diagnosed with MDR TB must be referred to a specialised treatment centre for initiation of effective therapy. MDR TB is difficult to diagnose and the centralised referral model is beset with challenges that contribute to treatment delays, increased patient morbidity and mortality, and MDR TB nosocomial transmission. Culture and DST takes 8 weeks or longer to obtain results while line probe assays (LPAs) can give a result in hours. LPAs and the GeneXpert MTB/Rif (GX) are ground-breaking discoveries for TB diagnosis. However, they are not easily accessible or available to those needing it, so culture and sensitivity testing remains the gold standard for diagnosis. Aim. This study aimed to assess the delay in the initiation of MDR TB treatment and profiled the patients being referred to a specialised drug-resistant treatment centre in KwaZulu-Natal. Results. Of all the patients, 75% referred showed a mean delay of 12.4 weeks from the date of sputum collection for culture and drug sensitivity testing to the start of treatment. Most of the patients were symptomatic for TB and HIV-positive. Discussion. Our findings suggest that current policy on the initiation of effective treatment needs urgent revision. Staff should be appropriately trained in LPA and GX technology to reduce delays in initiating treatment for MDR TB. The NDoH's plans for rapid diagnosis and reducing the treatment burden on centralised MDR TB management facilities are in the early phases of implementation and will take years to achieve favourable and significant outcomes. Conclusion. There is a significant delay in initiating definitive management for MDR TB.Correlation of mycobacterium tuberculosis specific and non-specific quantitative Th1 T-cell responses with bacillary load in a high burden setting.Measures of bacillary load in patients with tuberculosis (TB) may be useful for predicting and monitoring response to treatment. The relationship between quantitative T-cell responses and mycobacterial load remains unclear. We hypothesised that, in a HIV-prevalent high burden setting, the magnitude of mycobacterial antigen-specific and non-specific T-cell IFN-γ responses would correlate with (a) bacterial load and (b) culture conversion in patients undergoing treatment.We compared baseline (n = 147), 2 (n = 35) and 6 month (n = 13) purified-protein-derivative (PPD) and RD1-specific (TSPOT.TB and QFT-GIT) blood RD1-specific (TSPOT.TB; QFT-GIT) responses with associates of sputum bacillary load in patients with culture-confirmed TB in Cape Town, South Africa.IFN-γ responses were not associated with liquid culture time-to-positivity, smear-grade, Xpert MTB/RIF-generated cycle threshold values or the presence of cavities on the chest radiograph in patients with culture-confirmed TB and irrespective of HIV-status. 2-month IGRA conversion rates (positive-to-negative) were negligible [<11% for TSPOT.TB (3/28) and QFT-GIT (1/29)] and lower compared to culture [60% (21/35); p<0.01].In a high burden HIV-prevalent setting T-cell IFN-γ responses to M. tuberculosis-specific and non-specific antigens do not correlate with bacillary load, including Xpert MTB/RIF-generated C(T) values, and are therefore poorly suited for monitoring treatment and prognostication.Antigen detection as a point-of-care test for TB: the case of lipoarabinomannan.The limitations of sputum smear microscopy, routine chest radiology for HIV-associated TB and culture-based diagnosis are well recognized, especially in resource-limited settings. The diagnostic accuracy of a new point-of-care lateral-flow urine strip test for lipoarabinomannan (Determine(®) TB-LAM; Alere, MA, USA), which costs US$3.50 per test strip and provides results within 30 min, was evaluated in a cohort of South African patients for HIV-associated TB before starting anti-retroviral therapy in South Africa. Prevalence of culture-positive TB cases was 17.4%, among which 28.2% had sputum smear positivity. Determine(®) TB-LAM (Alere, MA, USA) had highest sensitivity at low CD4 cell counts: 66.7, 51.7 and 39.0% at <50 cells, <100 cells and <200 cells per µl, respectively; specificity was greater than 98% for all strata. There was an incremental sensitivity when Determine TB-LAM was combined with smear microscopy, which did not differ statistically from the sensitivities obtained by testing a single sputum sample with the Xpert(®) MTB/RIF (Cepheid; CA, USA) assay. Determine TB-LAM is a simple, low-cost alternative to existing diagnostic assays for TB screening in HIV-infected patients with very low CD4(+) cell counts.Clinical significance of lipoarabinomannan detection in urine using a low-cost point-of-care diagnostic assay for HIV-associated tuberculosis.A low-cost point-of-care urine assay for lipoarabinomannan (LAM) used for screening patients prior to antiretroviral therapy (ART) rapidly diagnoses a proportion of tuberculosis (TB) cases. We determined the characteristics and outcomes of such patients.Adults enrolling in a South African township ART clinic were systematically screened for pulmonary TB by testing paired sputum samples using microscopy, liquid culture and Xpert MTB/RIF in a centralized laboratory. Stored urine samples were retrospectively tested for LAM using the Determine TB-LAM assay, but results did not inform treatment. Patients were followed up in the routine ART service and early (90-day) programmatic outcomes were determined. Analysis was restricted to those with CD4 cell counts below 200 cells/μl.Of patients with CD4 cell counts below 200 cells/μl and complete results (n=325), 59 (18.2%) had culture-positive TB. Of these, 23 (39%) patients tested urine LAM-positive and 36 (61%) urine LAM-negative. Patients with LAM-positive TB had much lower CD4 cell counts, higher plasma viral loads, lower haemoglobin concentrations and lower BMIs compared to those with LAM-negative TB. They also had evidence of higher mycobacterial load, more frequently testing sputum smear-positive, Xpert-positive (sputum and urine) and having a shorter time to sputum culture positivity. Of five (8.5%) patients who died, four did so before TB treatment was started. All five retrospectively tested LAM-positive.A low-cost point-of-care urine test for LAM rapidly diagnoses a sub-group of cases with advanced HIV-associated TB and poor prognosis. If used in combination with laboratory-based diagnostics, treatment delays would decrease and survival might be improved.Can a simple flotation method lower the limit of detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in extrapulmonary samples analyzed by the GeneXpert MTB/RIF assay?The rapid and accurate diagnosis of tuberculosis (TB) in children and extrapulmonary TB in adults continues to be a challenge. In this study, we determined the lower limit of detection (LOD) of the GeneXpert MTB/RIF assay with nonrespiratory specimens and investigated the utility of flotation procedures for concentrating the bacilli. Clinical specimens (9 cerebrospinal fluid [CSF], 13 gastric aspirate, 8 tissue, and 17 stool) were spiked with single-celled Mycobacterium tuberculosis, and the LOD of the GeneXpert assay was determined. Flotation studies were conducted with sucrose and NaCl, and the cycle thresholds of the MTB/RIF assay were compared between treated and untreated samples. There was no significant difference between the LODs of the GeneXpert assay with saline solution (median, 33 CFU/ml) and CSF (median, 25 CFU/ml) (P > 0.05) or gastric aspirate samples (median, 58 CFU/ml) (P > 0.05). The LOD with spiked tissue (median, 1,525 CFU/ml) and stool samples (median, 6,800 CFU/ml) was significantly elevated compared to that determined with saline solution (P ≤ 0.05 and ≤ 0.0005, respectively). Flotation studies with sucrose or NaCl did not consistently result in lowered cycle thresholds in stool or gastric aspirates, but a cycle reduction of >10 was achieved in two of the three pooled CSF samples. Unlike the results seen with tissue and stool samples, there was no significant PCR inhibition in the MTB/RIF assay with CSF and gastric aspirates. Although preconcentration of CSF samples with sucrose and NaCl may enhance detection of M. tuberculosis by PCR, further advances are needed to concentrate the bacilli and eliminate PCR inhibitors in paucibacillary nonrespiratory samples.Increased and expedited case detection by Xpert MTB/RIF assay in childhood tuberculosis: a prospective cohort study.Diagnosis and timely treatment of tuberculosis in children is hampered by the absence of fast and reliable tests, especially in the era of human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic performance of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay (Xpert) in children with suspected tuberculosis in a high tuberculosis/HIV-burden setting.In a prospective study with a minimum follow-up of 12 months, 164 children with suspected tuberculosis were assigned to predefined diagnostic subgroups, based on microbiological and clinical findings. Results of smear microscopy and culture were compared against diagnostic performance of Xpert.Twenty-eight of 164 children (17.1%) had confirmed tuberculosis. Xpert detected 100% (95% confidence interval [CI], 59.0%-100%) of smear-positive cases and 66.6% (95% CI, 43.0%-85.4%) of culture-positive but smear-negative cases. In the per-sample analysis, Xpert displayed a similar sensitivity (54.7% [95% CI, 42.7%-66.2%]) compared with culture methods. Xpert detected 3-fold more confirmed tuberculosis cases than smear microscopy but with equal rapidity. Four additional cases (8.5%) with clinical tuberculosis but negative culture were diagnosed by Xpert. Testing second and third samples increased sensitivity by 20% and an additional 16%, respectively. When tuberculosis was reliably excluded, Xpert's specificity was 100%. HIV infection did not affect diagnostic accuracy of Xpert.Xpert was easy to perform and displayed similar diagnostic accuracy as culture methods in children with suspected tuberculosis. Rapid turnaround times should reduce treatment delay and improve patient outcome, although sensitivity remains suboptimal and access is dependent on local laboratory infrastructure.Characteristics and early outcomes of patients with Xpert MTB/RIF-negative pulmonary tuberculosis diagnosed during screening before antiretroviral therapy.A proportion of patients with tuberculosis diagnosed by sputum culture during screening before antiretroviral therapy (ART) have false-negative Xpert MTB/RIF assay results (Xpert-negative tuberculosis). We determined the characteristics and early ART program outcomes of such patients.Adult patients who enrolled in a South African township ART service were systematically screened for pulmonary tuberculosis regardless of symptoms by testing paired sputum samples with Xpert MTB/RIF and liquid culture. The ART service provided follow-up for all patients, and early (90-day) programmatic outcomes were determined.Among 602 patients screened, 523 had ≥1 Xpert and culture result, yielding 89 culture-positive tuberculosis diagnoses. Of these, 37 (42%) of the patients with tuberculosis were Xpert-negative when a single sputum sample was tested, compared with 25 (28%) when 2 samples were tested. Compared with patients with Xpert-positive tuberculosis, those with Xpert-negative tuberculosis (using either definition) had substantially higher CD4 cell counts, lower plasma viral loads, higher hemoglobin concentrations, and higher body mass index. Their tuberculosis was also less advanced, with a lower frequency of prolonged cough (≥2 weeks), less extensive radiographic abnormalities, and a lower frequency of detectable lipoarabinomannan antigenuria and mycobacteriuria. Xpert-negative cases were all sputum smear negative with prolonged time to culture positivity (median, 21 days). Despite greater delays in starting tuberculosis treatment, Xpert-negative patients were less likely to die during follow-up.Compared to patients with Xpert-positive tuberculosis diagnosed during pre-ART screening, Xpert-negative cases had less advanced immunosuppression and less advanced tuberculosis and did not have adverse outcomes despite substantial delays in starting tuberculosis treatment.Clinical validation of Xpert MTB/RIF for the diagnosis of extrapulmonary tuberculosis.Extrapulmonary tuberculosis (EPTB) accounts for more than 20% of tuberculosis (TB) cases. Xpert MTB/RIF (Xpert) (Cepheid, Sunnyvale, CA, USA) is a fully automated amplification system, for which excellent results in the diagnosis of pulmonary TB in highly endemic countries have been recently reported. We aimed to assess the performance of the Xpert system in diagnosing EPTB in a low incidence setting. We investigated with Xpert a large number of consecutive extrapulmonary clinical specimens (1,476, corresponding to 1,068 patients) including both paediatric (494) and adult samples. We found, in comparison with a reference standard consisting of combination of culture and clinical diagnosis of TB, an overall sensitivity and specificity of 81.3% and 99.8% for Xpert, while the sensitivity of microscopy was 48%. For biopsies, urines, pus and cerebrospinal fluids the sensitivity exceeded 85%, while it was slightly under 80% for gastric aspirates. It was, in contrast, lower than 50% for cavitary fluids. High sensitivity and specificity (86.9% and 99.7%, respectively) were also obtained for paediatric specimens. Although the role of culture remains central in the microbiological diagnosis of EPTB, the sensitivity of Xpert in rapidly diagnosing the disease makes it a much better choice compared to smear microscopy. The ability to rule out the disease still remains suboptimal.Effectiveness of an integrated real-time PCR method for detection of the Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex in smear-negative extrapulmonary samples in an area of low tuberculosis prevalence.Early extrapulmonary tuberculosis (EPTB) diagnosis is particularly difficult. Among 108 smear-negative extrapulmonary samples showing a positive culture for Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex (43 body fluids and 65 nonliquid specimens), 63 (58.3%) were positive with the Xpert MTB/RIF assay (GX). GX sensitivity was quite low for samples from sterile locations (especially for pleural fluids: 26.9%) but high for some nonliquid samples, like abscess aspirates (76.5%). In summary, GX may be a useful tool to be considered for EPTB diagnosis.The use of an automated quantitative polymerase chain reaction (Xpert MTB/RIF) to predict the sputum smear status of tuberculosis patients.Xpert MTB/RIF-generated cycle-threshold (C(T)) values have poor clinical utility as a rule-in test for smear positivity (cut-point ≤20.2; sensitivity 32.3%, specificity 97.1%) but moderately good rule-out value (cut-point >31.8; negative predictive value 80.0%). Thus, 20% of individuals with C(T) values >31.8 were erroneously ruled out as smear-negative. This group had a significantly lower sputum bacillary load relative to correctly classified smear-positive patients (C(T) ≤ 31.8; P < .001). These data inform on public health and contact tracing strategies.Clinical failures associated with rpoB mutations in phenotypically occult multidrug-resistant Mycobacterium tuberculosis.Recently, Mycobacterium tuberculosis isolates have been described that test phenotypically susceptible to rifampicin (RMP) yet harbour genotypic rpoB mutations.1) To investigate the impact of such mutations on clinical outcomes among RMP-susceptible isolates, and 2) to determine the prevalence of rpoB mutations among isoniazid (INH) monoresistant isolates at our laboratory and to describe the association between the presence of these mutations and clinical outcomes.M. tuberculosis isolates were screened for mutations in the rpoB gene using the Cepheid Gene-Xpert® MTB/RIF assay. Clinical correlation was made by reviewing patient case notes.Isolates from 94 patients were found to have INH-resistant, RMP-susceptible profiles. Clinical information was available for 52 patients, including three whose isolates had rpoB mutations. All three of these patients had treatment failures, compared to two of 49 patients whose isolates did not have rpoB mutations (P = 0.0005).We demonstrate a significant association between the presence of rpoB gene mutations that are not detected at the current RMP critical concentration and treatment failure. We suggest that a review of the current RMP critical concentration is warranted to ensure that RMP is not used inappropriately for the treatment of phenotypically occult multidrug-resistant tuberculosis.Do adjunct tuberculosis tests, when combined with Xpert MTB/RIF, improve accuracy and the cost of diagnosis in a resource-poor setting?Information regarding the utility of adjunct diagnostic tests in combination with Xpert MTB/RIF (Cepheid, Sunnyvale, CA, USA) is limited. We hypothesised adjunct tests could enhance accuracy and/or reduce the cost of tuberculosis (TB) diagnosis prior to MTB/RIF testing, and rule-in or rule-out TB in MTB/RIF-negative individuals. We assessed the accuracy and/or laboratory-associated cost of diagnosis of smear microscopy, chest radiography (CXR) and interferon-γ release assays (IGRAs; T-SPOT-TB (Oxford Immunotec, Oxford, UK) and QuantiFERON-TB Gold In-Tube (Cellestis, Chadstone, Australia)) combined with MTB/RIF for TB in 480 patients in South Africa. When conducted prior to MTB/RIF: 1) smear microscopy followed by MTB/RIF (if smear negative) had the lowest cost of diagnosis of any strategy investigated; 2) a combination of smear microscopy, CXR (if smear negative) and MTB/RIF (if imaging compatible with active TB) did not further reduce the cost per TB case diagnosed; and 3) a normal CXR ruled out TB in 18% of patients (57 out of 324; negative predictive value (NPV) 100%). When downstream adjunct tests were applied to MTB/RIF-negative individuals, radiology ruled out TB in 24% (56 out of 234; NPV 100%), smear microscopy ruled in TB in 21% (seven out of 24) of culture-positive individuals and IGRAs were not useful in either context. In resource-poor settings, smear microscopy combined with MTB/RIF had the highest accuracy and lowest cost of diagnosis compared to either technique alone. In MTB/RIF-negative individuals, CXR has poor rule-in value but can reliably rule out TB in approximately one in four cases. These data inform upon the programmatic utility of MTB/RIF in high-burden settings.Xpert® MTB/RIF assay: development, evaluation and implementation of a new rapid molecular diagnostic for tuberculosis and rifampicin resistance.Global TB control efforts have been severely hampered by the lack of diagnostic tests that are accurate, simple to use and can be applied at the point of clinical care. This has been further compounded by the widespread inability to test for drug resistance. The Xpert(®) MTB/RIF assay is a rapid molecular assay that can be used close to the point of care by operators with minimal technical expertise, enabling diagnosis of TB and simultaneous assessment of rifampicin resistance to be completed within 2 h. Moreover, this can be accomplished using unprocessed sputum samples as well as clinical specimens from extrapulmonary sites. We review in detail the development of this assay, its evaluation within the laboratory, its utility among adult and pediatric TB suspects, its use as a screening tool for HIV-associated TB and studies of its implementation at the district and sub-district levels in resource-limited settings. Following endorsement by the WHO in 2010, we consider the next steps in the implementation of the assay and its potential impact in high burden settings.GeneXpert® MTB/RIF for rapid detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in pulmonary and extra-pulmonary samples.Detecting drug-resistant tuberculosis: the importance of rapid testing.Despite numerous intervention strategies, including the direct observed short-course treatment strategy and improved diagnostic methods, the incidence of multidrug-resistant and extensively drug-resistant tuberculosis (TB) continues to rise globally. Many treatment policies are based on the model that acquisition of drug resistance in already infected individuals drives the drug-resistant TB epidemic, hence the focus on drug-resistance testing of retreatment cases. However, molecular epidemiology and mathematical modeling suggest that the majority of multidrug-resistant TB cases are due to ongoing transmission of multidrug-resistant strains. This is most likely the result of diagnostic delay, thereby emphasizing the need for rapid diagnostics and comprehensive contact tracing, as well as active case finding. Current diagnosis of TB in low-income, high-burden regions relies on smear microscopy and clinical signs and symptoms. However, this smear-centered approach has many pitfalls, including low sensitivity in HIV patients and children, the inability of smear to reveal drug-resistance patterns, and the need for sampling on consecutive days. In order to address these limitations, efforts have been made to expand access to Mycobacterium tuberculosis culture and drug susceptibility testing. However, the slow growth rate of the causative agent, M. tuberculosis, contributes to significant diagnostic delay. Molecular-based diagnostic methods, targeting mutations that are known to confirm drug resistance, are capable of significantly reducing diagnostic delay. Two such methods, the line-probe assay and the real-time PCR-based Xpert® MTB/RIF assay, have been described. The latter test shows particular promise for smear-negative and extrapulmonary specimens. This may prove especially useful in settings where co-infection rates with HIV are high. However, since most research focuses on the performance of both of these assays, further investigations need to be done regarding the impact of the routine implementation of these assays on TB control programs and the cost effectiveness thereof.Comparison of two nucleic acid amplification assays, the Xpert MTB/RIF assay and the amplified Mycobacterium Tuberculosis Direct assay, for detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in respiratory and nonrespiratory specimens.We compared the performance of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay, a new real-time tuberculosis (TB) PCR test, with that of the Amplified Mycobacterium Tuberculosis Direct (MTD) assay using 162 respiratory and nonrespiratory specimens. Based on culture as the gold standard, the overall sensitivity and specificity for all sample types for the Xpert MTB/RIF assay were 90.9 and 89%, respectively, while for the MTD assay, the overall sensitivity and specificity were 97.3 and 87.1%, respectively. A higher proportion of total equivocal results were obtained for the MTD assay, at 10.5% (17/162), while the Xpert MTB/RIF assay generated 5.5% (9/162) of invalid reads.Performance of Xpert MTB/RIF RUO assay and IS6110 real-time PCR for Mycobacterium tuberculosis detection in clinical samples.The Cepheid Xpert MTB/RIF research-use-only (RUO) assay and a laboratory-developed test (LDT) targeting IS6110 were evaluated and compared to mycobacterial culture as the gold standard. The performance characteristics of both molecular assays were determined by using 112 specimens from 90 patients, including 89 pulmonary specimens and 23 extrapulmonary specimens. Of the specimens tested, 37 (33%) were culture positive for the Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex; 29 were pulmonary, and 8 were extrapulmonary. Of these culture-positive specimens, 83% of the pulmonary specimens and 50% of the extrapulmonary specimens were smear positive. There was complete concordance between the smear-positive culture-positive specimens, independent of the anatomical site (100% sensitivity). The sensitivity of the MTB/RIF RUO assay for smear-negative specimens was 60% for pulmonary and 75% for extrapulmonary specimens, while the IS6110 LDT sensitivities were 40% and 0%, respectively. There was also complete concordance among the culture-negative specimens tested. Both assays showed 95% specificity, with four culture-negative specimens testing as positive. A review of patient records indicated that there was a high likelihood of the presence of M. tuberculosis complex DNA in the false-positive specimens. Biosafety analysis was performed and showed an acceptable reduction in organism viability using the processing methods described above. Both molecular assays are suitable for the detection of M. tuberculosis isolates in smear-positive pulmonary and extrapulmonary specimens, while the sensitivity of the detection of M. tuberculosis isolates in smear-negative specimens was variable.A multisite assessment of the quantitative capabilities of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay.The Xpert MTB/RIF is an automated molecular test for Mycobacterium tuberculosis that estimates bacterial burden by measuring the threshold-cycle (Ct) of its M. tuberculosis-specific real-time polymerase chain reaction. Bacterial burden is an important biomarker for disease severity, infection control risk, and response to therapy.Evaluate bacterial load quantitation by Xpert MTB/RIF compared with conventional quantitative methods.Xpert MTB/RIF results were compared with smear-microscopy, semiquantiative solid culture, and time-to-detection in liquid culture for 741 patients and 2,008 samples tested in a multisite clinical trial. An internal control real-time polymerase chain reaction was evaluated for its ability to identify inaccurate quantitative Xpert MTB/RIF results.Assays with an internal control Ct greater than 34 were likely to be inaccurately quantitated; this represented 15% of M. tuberculosis-positive tests. Excluding these, decreasing M. tuberculosis Ct was associated with increasing smear microscopy grade for smears of concentrated sputum pellets (r(s) = -0.77) and directly from sputum (r(s) =-0.71). A Ct cutoff of approximately 27.7 best predicted smear-positive status. The association between M. tuberculosis Ct and time-to-detection in liquid culture (r(s) = 0.68) and semiquantitative colony counts (r(s) = -0.56) was weaker than smear. Tests of paired same-patient sputum showed that high viscosity sputum samples contained ×32 more M. tuberculosis than nonviscous samples. Comparisons between the grade of the acid-fast bacilli smear and Xpert MTB/RIF quantitative data across study sites enabled us to identify a site outlier in microscopy.Xpert MTB/RIF quantitation offers a new, standardized approach to measuring bacterial burden in the sputum of patients with tuberculosis.Xpert MTB/RIF test for tuberculosis.Xpert MTB/RIF test for tuberculosis.Xpert MTB/RIF test for tuberculosis.Screening for HIV-associated tuberculosis and rifampicin resistance before antiretroviral therapy using the Xpert MTB/RIF assay: a prospective study.The World Health Organization has endorsed the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for investigation of patients suspected of having tuberculosis (TB). However, its utility for routine TB screening and detection of rifampicin resistance among HIV-infected patients with advanced immunodeficiency enrolling in antiretroviral therapy (ART) services is unknown.Consecutive adult HIV-infected patients with no current TB diagnosis enrolling in an ART clinic in a South African township were recruited regardless of symptoms. They were clinically characterised and invited to provide two sputum samples at a single visit. The accuracy of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for diagnosing TB and drug resistance was assessed in comparison with other tests, including fluorescence smear microscopy and automated liquid culture (gold standard) and drug susceptibility testing. Of 515 patients enrolled, 468 patients (median CD4 cell count, 171 cells/µl; interquartile range, 102-236) produced at least one sputum sample, yielding complete sets of results from 839 samples. Mycobacterium tuberculosis was cultured from 81 patients (TB prevalence, 17.3%). The overall sensitivity of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for culture-positive TB was 73.3% (specificity, 99.2%) compared to 28.0% (specificity, 100%) using smear microscopy. All smear-positive, culture-positive disease was detected by Xpert MTB/RIF from a single sample (sensitivity, 100%), whereas the sensitivity for smear-negative, culture-positive TB was 43.4% from one sputum sample and 62.3% from two samples. Xpert correctly identified rifampicin resistance in all four cases of multidrug-resistant TB but incorrectly identified resistance in three other patients whose disease was confirmed to be drug sensitive by gene sequencing (specificity, 94.1%; positive predictive value, 57%).In this population of individuals at high risk of TB, intensive screening using the Xpert MTB/RIF assay increased case detection by 45% compared with smear microscopy, strongly supporting replacement of microscopy for this indication. However, despite the ability of the assay to rapidly detect rifampicin-resistant disease, the specificity for drug-resistant TB was sub-optimal.GeneXpert--a game-changer for tuberculosis control?Is scale-up worth it? Challenges in economic analysis of diagnostic tests for tuberculosis.David Dowdy and colleagues discuss the complexities of costing new TB diagnostic tests, including GeneXpert, and argue that flexible analytic tools are needed for decision-makers to adapt large-sample cost-effectiveness data to local conditions.Comparison of Xpert MTB/RIF with other nucleic acid technologies for diagnosing pulmonary tuberculosis in a high HIV prevalence setting: a prospective study.The Xpert MTB/RIF (Cepheid) non-laboratory-based molecular assay has potential to improve the diagnosis of tuberculosis (TB), especially in HIV-infected populations, through increased sensitivity, reduced turnaround time (2 h), and immediate identification of rifampicin (RIF) resistance. In a prospective clinical validation study we compared the performance of Xpert MTB/RIF, MTBDRplus (Hain Lifescience), LightCycler Mycobacterium Detection (LCTB) (Roche), with acid fast bacilli (AFB) smear microscopy and liquid culture on a single sputum specimen.Consecutive adults with suspected TB attending a primary health care clinic in Johannesburg, South Africa, were prospectively enrolled and evaluated for TB according to the guidelines of the National TB Control Programme, including assessment for smear-negative TB by chest X-ray, clinical evaluation, and HIV testing. A single sputum sample underwent routine decontamination, AFB smear microscopy, liquid culture, and phenotypic drug susceptibility testing. Residual sample was batched for molecular testing. For the 311 participants, the HIV prevalence was 70% (n = 215), with 120 (38.5%) culture-positive TB cases. Compared to liquid culture, the sensitivities of all the test methodologies, determined with a limited and potentially underpowered sample size (n = 177), were 59% (47%-71%) for smear microscopy, 76% (64%-85%) for MTBDRplus, 76% (64%-85%) for LCTB, and 86% (76%-93%) for Xpert MTB/RIF, with specificities all >97%. Among HIV+ individuals, the sensitivity of the Xpert MTB/RIF test was 84% (69%-93%), while the other molecular tests had sensitivities reduced by 6%. TB detection among smear-negative, culture-positive samples was 28% (5/18) for MTBDRplus, 22% (4/18) for LCTB, and 61% (11/18) for Xpert MTB/RIF. A few (n = 5) RIF-resistant cases were detected using the phenotypic drug susceptibility testing methodology. Xpert MTB/RIF detected four of these five cases (fifth case not tested) and two additional phenotypically sensitive cases.The Xpert MTB/RIF test has superior performance for rapid diagnosis of Mycobacterium tuberculosis over existing AFB smear microscopy and other molecular methodologies in an HIV- and TB-endemic region. Its place in the clinical diagnostic algorithm in national health programs needs exploration. Please see later in the article for the Editors' Summary.Xpert MTB/RIF®, a novel automated polymerase chain reaction-based tool for the diagnosis of tuberculosis.There is an urgent need for new point of care tests for tuberculosis (TB). Xpert MTB/RIF® is a real-time polymerase chain reaction-based system that detects Mycobacterium tuberculosis DNA and rifampicin (RMP) resistance modulating mutations directly from clinical samples in 2 h. The sensitivity for detecting M. tuberculosis in culture-positive samples was 93.8% (60/64) and exceeded smear microscopy (40/64, 62.5%). The specificity for detecting M. tuberculosis was 92.0% (23/25) and for RMP resistance it was 100% (8/8). The test is simple to conduct and requires basic sputum handling facilities only. These characteristics render it a promising close-to-patient test for TB in various settings.Cepheid GeneXpert MTB/RIF assay for Mycobacterium tuberculosis detection and rifampin resistance identification in patients with substantial clinical indications of tuberculosis and smear-negative microscopy results.The GeneXpert MTB/RIF assay was evaluated with microscopically negative and positive pulmonary and extrapulmonary specimens from patients with substantial clinical indications for tuberculosis. For the pulmonary samples, the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values were 90.6%, 94.3%, 93.5%, and 91.7%, and for the extrapulmonary samples, they were 100%, 91.6%, 50%, and 100%, respectively. For microscopically negative specimens, the respective values were 86.3%, 93%, 79%, and 95.6%. The assay correctly detected rifampin resistance in all but one specimen, which harbored a mixed population. The GeneXpert assay was highly effective for tuberculosis diagnosis and identification of rifampin-resistant strains in smear-negative samples.Comparison of two molecular methods for rapid diagnosis of extrapulmonary tuberculosis.Application of real-time PCR for the detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis enables results to be obtained in about 2 h. A total of 340 nonrespiratory samples were processed using two real-time PCR assay kits: Xpert MTB/RIF and Cobas TaqMan MTB. The sensitivity and specificity of the Xpert assay were 95% and 100%, respectively, compared to 78% and 98% for the Cobas assay.Xpert MTB/RIF: a new pillar in diagnosis of extrapulmonary tuberculosis?Approximately 10 to 15% of tuberculosis (TB) cases in India are estimated to have extrapulmonary disease, and due to a lack of diagnostic means, they often remain untreated. The early detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis and multidrug resistance is a priority in TB diagnosis to improve the successful treatment rate of TB and reduce transmission. The Xpert MTB/RIF (Xpert) test, recently endorsed by the World Health Organization for the detection of pulmonary TB, was evaluated to test its utility in 547 patients with suspected extrapulmonary tuberculosis. Five hundred forty-seven extrapulmonary specimens were split and processed simultaneously for both culture (solid and liquid) and Xpert testing. For culture, the sensitivity was low, 53% (150/283 specimens). Xpert sensitivity and specificity results were assessed in comparison to a composite reference standard made up of smear and culture results and clinical, radiological, and histological findings. The sensitivity of the Xpert assay was 81% (228/283 specimens) (64% [89/138] for smear-negative cases and 96% [139/145] for smear-positive cases), with a specificity of 99.6%. The sensitivity was found to be high for the majority of specimen types (63 to 100%) except for cerebrospinal fluid, the sensitivity of which was 29% (2/7 specimens). The Xpert test correctly identified 98% of phenotypic rifampin (RIF)-resistant cases and 94% of phenotypic RIF-susceptible cases. Sequencing of the 6 discrepant samples resolved 3 of them, resulting in an increased specificity of 98%. In conclusion, the results of this study suggest that the Xpert test also shows good potential for the diagnosis of extrapulmonary TB and that its ease of use makes it applicable for countries where TB is endemic.Feasibility, diagnostic accuracy, and effectiveness of decentralised use of the Xpert MTB/RIF test for diagnosis of tuberculosis and multidrug resistance: a multicentre implementation study.The Xpert MTB/RIF test (Cepheid, Sunnyvale, CA, USA) can detect tuberculosis and its multidrug-resistant form with very high sensitivity and specificity in controlled studies, but no performance data exist from district and subdistrict health facilities in tuberculosis-endemic countries. We aimed to assess operational feasibility, accuracy, and effectiveness of implementation in such settings.We assessed adults (≥18 years) with suspected tuberculosis or multidrug-resistant tuberculosis consecutively presenting with cough lasting at least 2 weeks to urban health centres in South Africa, Peru, and India, drug-resistance screening facilities in Azerbaijan and the Philippines, and an emergency room in Uganda. Patients were excluded from the main analyses if their second sputum sample was collected more than 1 week after the first sample, or if no valid reference standard or MTB/RIF test was available. We compared one-off direct MTB/RIF testing in nine microscopy laboratories adjacent to study sites with 2-3 sputum smears and 1-3 cultures, dependent on site, and drug-susceptibility testing. We assessed indicators of robustness including indeterminate rate and between-site performance, and compared time to detection, reporting, and treatment, and patient dropouts for the techniques used.We enrolled 6648 participants between Aug 11, 2009, and June 26, 2010. One-off MTB/RIF testing detected 933 (90·3%) of 1033 culture-confirmed cases of tuberculosis, compared with 699 (67·1%) of 1041 for microscopy. MTB/RIF test sensitivity was 76·9% in smear-negative, culture-positive patients (296 of 385 samples), and 99·0% specific (2846 of 2876 non-tuberculosis samples). MTB/RIF test sensitivity for rifampicin resistance was 94·4% (236 of 250) and specificity was 98·3% (796 of 810). Unlike microscopy, MTB/RIF test sensitivity was not significantly lower in patients with HIV co-infection. Median time to detection of tuberculosis for the MTB/RIF test was 0 days (IQR 0-1), compared with 1 day (0-1) for microscopy, 30 days (23-43) for solid culture, and 16 days (13-21) for liquid culture. Median time to detection of resistance was 20 days (10-26) for line-probe assay and 106 days (30-124) for conventional drug-susceptibility testing. Use of the MTB/RIF test reduced median time to treatment for smear-negative tuberculosis from 56 days (39-81) to 5 days (2-8). The indeterminate rate of MTB/RIF testing was 2·4% (126 of 5321 samples) compared with 4·6% (441 of 9690) for cultures.The MTB/RIF test can effectively be used in low-resource settings to simplify patients' access to early and accurate diagnosis, thereby potentially decreasing morbidity associated with diagnostic delay, dropout and mistreatment.Foundation for Innovative New Diagnostics, Bill & Melinda Gates Foundation, European and Developing Countries Clinical Trials Partnership (TA2007.40200.009), Wellcome Trust (085251/B/08/Z), and UK Department for International Development.Tuberculosis assays: past, present and future.Recent developments in the field of TB diagnostics, including the introduction of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay in field testing, raise the hope for faster and more accurate identification of active TB patients. However, there are still many issues that need to be addressed as no point-of-care tests are yet available. Furthermore, no tests are available which are universally applicable to all patients. Improvements in the microbiological and molecular-based approaches are promising and the diagnostic pipeline is encouraging. Host markers associated with active disease may hold promise, especially in situations where sputum diagnostics are problematic, including in children, HIV-infected individuals and in the case of extrapulmonary TB.Evaluation of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay for the diagnosis of pulmonary tuberculosis in a high HIV prevalence setting.Xpert MTB/RIF is a novel automated molecular diagnostic recently endorsed by the World Health Organization. However, performance-related data from high HIV prevalence settings are limited.The impact of sample-related factors on performance and the significance of Xpert MTB/RIF-positive culture-negative discordance remain unclear.Xpert MTB/RIF was evaluated using single archived spot-sputum samples from 496 South African patients with suspected TB. Mycobacterium tuberculosis culture positivity and phenotypic resistance to rifampicin served as reference standards.Overall, Xpert MTB/RIF detected 95% (95% confidence interval [CI], 88-98%; 89 of 94) of smear-positive culture-positive cases and the specificity was 94% (91-96%; 320 of 339). The sensitivity in smear-negative cases was 55% (35-73%; 12 of 22) when the analysis was restricted to 1 ml of unprocessed sputum and culture time-to-positivity of less than or equal to 28 days. Compared with smear microscopy (n=94), Xpert MTB/RIF detected an additional 17 cases (n=111) representing an 18% (11-27%; 111 vs. 94) relative increase in the rapid TB case detection rate. Moreover, compared with smear microscopy, the inclusion of Xpert MTB/RIF-positive culture-negative TB cases (ruled-in by an alternative diagnostic method) resulted in the detection of a further 16 cases (n=127), thus significantly increasing the rapid TB case detection rate to 35% (95% CI, 26-45%; 94 to 111 vs. 94 to 127; P<0.01), the overall specificity to 99.1% (97-100%; 320 of 323; P<0.001), and sensitivity in smear-negative TB to 60% (P=0.12). Performance strongly correlated with smear status and culture time-to-positivity. In patients infected with HIV compared with patients uninfected with HIV Xpert MTB/RIF showed a trend to reduced sensitivity (P=0.09) and significantly reduced negative predictive value (P=0.01). The negative predictive value for rifampicin resistance was 99.4%.XpertMTB/RIF outperformed smear microscopy, established a diagnosis in a significant proportion of patients with smear-negative TB, detected many highly likely TB cases missed by culture, and accurately ruled out rifampicin-resistant TB. Sample-specific factors had limited impact on performance. Performance in patients infected with HIV, especially those with advanced immunosuppression, warrants further study.[Treatment and diagnostics of tuberculosis: moving slowly forward].Development of new drugs for the treatment of drug sensitive and drug resistant tuberculosis is badly needed. Substantial progress has been made in the field and presently six new drug components are in clinical phase I and II trials. Drugs approved for other indications e.g. newer fluoroquinolones and oxazolidinones are also being assessed in human phase II and III trials. Efforts are made to develop easy-to-handle diagnostic tools that will allow early detection of potential MDR or XDR cases. The Xpert RIF/MTB is a prototype of such an invention. At long last the field is moving slowly forward.Comparison of the Xpert MTB/RIF test with an IS6110-TaqMan real-time PCR assay for direct detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in respiratory and nonrespiratory specimens.The sensitivities of the Xpert MTB/RIF test and an in-house IS6110-based real-time PCR using TaqMan probes (IS6110-TaqMan assay) for the detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex (MTBC) DNA were compared by use of 117 clinical specimens (97 culture positive and 20 culture negative for MTBC) that were frozen in sediment. The 97 clinical specimens included 60 respiratory and 37 nonrespiratory specimens distributed into 36 smear-positive and 61 smear-negative specimens. Among the 97 culture-positive specimens, 4 had rifampin-resistant isolates. Both methods were highly specific and exhibited excellent sensitivity (100%) with smear-positive specimens. The sensitivity of the Xpert MTB/RIF test with the whole smear-negative specimens was more reduced than that of the IS6110-TaqMan assay (48 versus 69%, P = 0.005). Both methods exhibited similar sensitivities with smear-negative respiratory specimens, but the Xpert MTB/RIF test had lower sensitivity with smear-negative nonrespiratory specimens than the IS6110-TaqMan assay (37 versus 71%, P = 0.013). Finally, the sensitivities of the Xpert MTB/RIF test and the IS6110-TaqMan assay were 79% and 84%, respectively, with respiratory specimens and 53% and 78%, respectively (P = 0.013), with nonrespiratory specimens. The Xpert MTB/RIF test correctly detected the rifampin resistance in smear-positive specimens but not in the one smear-negative specimen. The Xpert MTB/RIF test is a simple rapid method well adapted to a routine laboratory that appeared to be as sensitive as the IS6110-TaqMan assay with respiratory specimens but less sensitive with paucibacillary specimens, such as smear-negative nonrespiratory specimens.Rapid and efficient detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in respiratory and non-respiratory samples.The detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis using a new commercial real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR) assay (Xpert™ MTB/RIF) was evaluated on 91 respiratory and 89 non-respiratory samples recovered from 132 patients suspected of tuberculosis (TB). Overall, 31 (17.2%) of the 180 samples, including 17 respiratory and 14 non-respiratory (respectively 17 and 12 PCR-positive), yielded M. tuberculosis on culture. The sensitivity and specificity of PCR were respectively 100% and 100%, and 85.7% and 97.3% for respiratory and non-respiratory samples. Although the test is validated only for respiratory samples, our findings suggest that it could be useful for the diagnosis of extra-pulmonary TB.[Evaluation of Xpert MTB/RIF results for the detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis in clinical samples].Tuberculosis is still a major global health problem. Nowadays nucleic acid amplification tests which are recommended by the World Health Organization (WHO) become popular methods for the rapid detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex (MTC). Recently introduced commercial Xpert MTB/RIF (Cepheid, USA) system is also a molecular method based on real-time polymerase chain reaction for simultaneous detection of both MTC and rifampicin resistance in the clinical sample. The sample processing, nucleic acid extraction, amplification and detection of known mutations related to rifampicin resistance are performed in a single cartridge in this integrated system and the results are obtained in two hours. The aim of this study was to evaluate the performance of Xpert MTB/RIF system for the detection of M.tuberculosis in pre-processed clinical samples by comparing the results obtained by Bactec 460TB 12B (BD Diagnostic, USA), Löwenstein-Jensen (LJ) culture and direct microscopy of smears stained with Ziehl- Neelsen (ZN). A total of 85 clinical specimens (50 sputum, 25 bronchoalveolar lavage, five thorasynthesis fluid and five urine samples) obtained from tuberculosis-suspected patients were included to the study. All specimens were decontaminated and this decontaminated suspension was used in the diagnostic methods, except for Xpert MTB/RIF process. Twenty-five (29%) of the samples yielded positive result with Bactec 460TB, 25 (29%) were found positive with Xpert MTB/RIF, 15 (18%) were found positive with LJ and 11 (13%) were found positive with ZN staining method. High consistency was detected between the results of Bactec 460TB and Xpert MTB/RIF when Bactec 460TB was considered as the gold standard method (r= 0.943; p= 0.000). One specimen yielded false positive result with Xpert MTB/RIF when compared to the reference method. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of Xpert MTB/RIF test were then estimated as 96%, 98%, 96% and 98%, respectively. No resistance were detected for the tested isolates. This study suggested that the sensitivity of Xpert MTB/RIF system in direct detection of M.tuberculosis in smear positive and smear negative samples was consistent with the reference methods. Moreover, the MTB/RIF test provided sensitive detection of tuberculosis in less than two hours.Evaluation of the Cepheid Xpert MTB/RIF assay for direct detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex in respiratory specimens.A total of 217 specimens submitted for routine smear and culture from three different sites within the western United States were used to evaluate the GeneXpert MTB/RIF assay (for research use only) (Cepheid, Sunnyvale, CA). Overall agreement compared to culture was 89% (98% for smear positives and 72% for smear negatives) for detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis.Rapid molecular detection of extrapulmonary tuberculosis by the automated GeneXpert MTB/RIF system.In total, 521 nonrespiratory specimens (91 urine, 30 gastric aspirate, 245 tissue, 113 pleural fluid, 19 cerebrospinal fluid [CSF], and 23 stool specimens) submitted to the German National Reference Laboratory for Mycobacteria (NRL) from May 2009 to August 2010 were comparatively investigated with the new molecular-based GeneXpert MTB/RIF (Xpert) assay system and conventional liquid and solid culture methods. Twenty (3.8%) of the 521 specimens gave no interpretable result. Whereas the sensitivity of the Xpert assay with tissue specimens was 69.0% (20 out of 29 culture-positive cases detected), 100% sensitivity was found with the urine and stool specimens. The combined sensitivity and specificity of the Xpert assay were calculated to be 77.3% and 98.2%, respectively.Rapid molecular detection of tuberculosis.Rapid detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex and rifampin resistance in smear-negative clinical samples by use of an integrated real-time PCR method.Sixty-four of 85 (75.3%) smear-negative respiratory (n = 78) and nonrespiratory (n = 7) samples with positive cultures of Mycobacterium tuberculosis complex (MTC) were detected by the GeneXpert system using the Xpert MTB/RIF assay (GX). In addition, GX found rpoB mutations in all six of the rifampin-resistant strains detected. The test was negative in 20 culture-negative and 20 nontuberculous culture-positive samples (100% specificity). GX offers high potential for the diagnosis of tuberculosis due to its capacity for direct detection of MTC, its rapidity, and its simplicity.The urgent need for new diagnostics for symptomatic tuberculosis in children.TB is a major public health problem causing 9 million cases, of which 10%-15% occur in children each year. Historically, children have received lower priority within TB control activities because they are considered less infectious than smear-positive adults. This review argues that TB is a public health problem in children and that poor awareness of the magnitude of the problem emanates from the lack of suitable pediatric diagnostic tests for TB and the characteristics of the disease in young children. New TB diagnostics, approved for use in adults have not been evaluated in children, although there is limited evidence that some of these tests hold promise and should be assessed. There are several approaches that could be used to improve the performance of tests in pediatric patients. These include improved methods for specimen collection and processing. The value of collecting specimens from multiple anatomical sites to shorten the diagnostic process and improve sensitivity was reported recently and the combination of expectorated sputum, nasopharyngeal aspirate, induce sputum and gastric aspirate may result in a similar yield than specimens collected over consecutive days. Methods for sample collection such as fine needle aspiration biopsy should be used more frequently and the Microscopic Observation Drug Sensitivity (MODS) assay has higher sensitivity than LJ culture. There is however very scanty evidence of the performance of other promising tests such as the fully automated NAAT (Xpert) and Line Probe Assays and loop mediated isothermal amplification. Although the future holds promise, increased support from international organizations and funding agencies is needed to promote the evaluation and development of new diagnostics that are suitable for TB in children.Xpert(®) MTB/RIF for point-of-care diagnosis of TB in high-HIV burden, resource-limited countries: hype or hope?Despite the identification of Mycobacterium tuberculosis as the cause of tuberculosis (TB) more than a century ago, diagnosing TB in resource-poor countries remains a challenge, especially in people living with HIV. In the past decade, important research investments have been made towards the development of new diagnostics for TB and the Xpert(®) MTB/RIF assay (Cepheid, CA, USA) has emerged as one of the most promising. In this article, we review the current knowledge on Xpert MTB/RIF, discuss the potential value of Xpert MTB/RIF as a point-of-care diagnostic for drug-sensitive and drug-resistant TB, and outline the potential indications for the assay in resource-limited, high-HIV burden settings. We also discuss key research questions that need to be addressed prior to possible large-scale implementation of the assay.Rapid molecular detection of tuberculosis and rifampin resistance.Global control of tuberculosis is hampered by slow, insensitive diagnostic methods, particularly for the detection of drug-resistant forms and in patients with human immunodeficiency virus infection. Early detection is essential to reduce the death rate and interrupt transmission, but the complexity and infrastructure needs of sensitive methods limit their accessibility and effect.We assessed the performance of Xpert MTB/RIF, an automated molecular test for Mycobacterium tuberculosis (MTB) and resistance to rifampin (RIF), with fully integrated sample processing in 1730 patients with suspected drug-sensitive or multidrug-resistant pulmonary tuberculosis. Eligible patients in Peru, Azerbaijan, South Africa, and India provided three sputum specimens each. Two specimens were processed with N-acetyl-L-cysteine and sodium hydroxide before microscopy, solid and liquid culture, and the MTB/RIF test, and one specimen was used for direct testing with microscopy and the MTB/RIF test.Among culture-positive patients, a single, direct MTB/RIF test identified 551 of 561 patients with smear-positive tuberculosis (98.2%) and 124 of 171 with smear-negative tuberculosis (72.5%). The test was specific in 604 of 609 patients without tuberculosis (99.2%). Among patients with smear-negative, culture-positive tuberculosis, the addition of a second MTB/RIF test increased sensitivity by 12.6 percentage points and a third by 5.1 percentage points, to a total of 90.2%. As compared with phenotypic drug-susceptibility testing, MTB/RIF testing correctly identified 200 of 205 patients (97.6%) with rifampin-resistant bacteria and 504 of 514 (98.1%) with rifampin-sensitive bacteria. Sequencing resolved all but two cases in favor of the MTB/RIF assay.The MTB/RIF test provided sensitive detection of tuberculosis and rifampin resistance directly from untreated sputum in less than 2 hours with minimal hands-on time. (Funded by the Foundation for Innovative New Diagnostics.)Containment of bioaerosol infection risk by the Xpert MTB/RIF assay and its applicability to point-of-care settings.The recently introduced Xpert MTB/RIF assay (Xpert) has point-of-care potential, but its capacity for biohazard containment remained to be studied. We compared the bioaerosols generated by the Xpert assay to acid-fast bacillus (AFB) microscope slide smear preparation. The Xpert assay sample treatment reagent (SR) was also studied for its sterilizing capacity, stability, and effect on assay sensitivity after prolonged treatment. During the preparation of AFB smears, sputum samples spiked with Mycobacterium bovis BCG at 5 × 10(8) CFU/ml produced 16 and 325 CFU/m(3) air measured with an Andersen impactor or BioSampler, respectively. In contrast, neither the sample preparation steps for the Xpert assay nor its automated processing produced any culturable bioaerosols. In testing of SR sterilizing capacity, clinical sputum samples from strongly smear-positive tuberculosis patients treated with SR at a 2:1 ratio eliminated Mycobacterium tuberculosis growth in all but 1/39 or 3/45 samples cultured on solid or liquid medium, respectively. These few unsterilized samples had a mean 13.1-day delay in the time to positive culture. SR treatment at a 3:1 ratio eliminated growth in all samples. SR retained a greater than 6-log-unit killing capacity despite storage at temperatures spanning 4 to 45°C for at least 3 months. The effect of prolonged SR sample treatment was also studied. Spiked sputum samples could be incubated in SR for up to 3 days without affecting Xpert sensitivity for M. tuberculosis detection and up to 8 h without affecting specificity for rifampin resistance detection. These results suggest that benchtop use of the Xpert MTB/RIF assay limits infection risk to the user.Rapid detection of Mycobacterium tuberculosis and rifampin resistance by use of on-demand, near-patient technology.Current nucleic acid amplification methods to detect Mycobacterium tuberculosis are complex, labor-intensive, and technically challenging. We developed and performed the first analysis of the Cepheid Gene Xpert System's MTB/RIF assay, an integrated hands-free sputum-processing and real-time PCR system with rapid on-demand, near-patient technology, to simultaneously detect M. tuberculosis and rifampin resistance. Analytic tests of M. tuberculosis DNA demonstrated a limit of detection (LOD) of 4.5 genomes per reaction. Studies using sputum spiked with known numbers of M. tuberculosis CFU predicted a clinical LOD of 131 CFU/ml. Killing studies showed that the assay's buffer decreased M. tuberculosis viability by at least 8 logs, substantially reducing biohazards. Tests of 23 different commonly occurring rifampin resistance mutations demonstrated that all 23 (100%) would be identified as rifampin resistant. An analysis of 20 nontuberculosis mycobacteria species confirmed high assay specificity. A small clinical validation study of 107 clinical sputum samples from suspected tuberculosis cases in Vietnam detected 29/29 (100%) smear-positive culture-positive cases and 33/39 (84.6%) or 38/53 (71.7%) smear-negative culture-positive cases, as determined by growth on solid medium or on both solid and liquid media, respectively. M. tuberculosis was not detected in 25/25 (100%) of the culture-negative samples. A study of 64 smear-positive culture-positive sputa from retreatment tuberculosis cases in Uganda detected 63/64 (98.4%) culture-positive cases and 9/9 (100%) cases of rifampin resistance. Rifampin resistance was excluded in 54/55 (98.2%) susceptible cases. Specificity rose to 100% after correcting for a conventional susceptibility test error. In conclusion, this highly sensitive and simple-to-use system can detect M. tuberculosis directly from sputum in less than 2 h.